4904 | risky (adjective): involving risk or danger | loc: riskant
  EN TS: Those chairs look a bit risky.
  de TS: Diese Stühle sehen etwas riskant aus.
  EN FS: Those tables look a bit risky.
  de FS: Diese Tische sehen etwas riskant aus.
  EN TP: a risky stack of chairs
  de TP: ein riskanter Stuhlstapel
  EN FP: a risky bet on horses
  de FP: eine riskante Pferdewette
4905 | span (verb): to cover or extend over an area | loc: überspannen
  EN TS: The bridge spans the canyon.
  de TS: Die Brücke überspannt die Schlucht.
  EN FS: The bridge spans the street.
  de FS: Die Brücke überspannt die Straße.
  EN TP: arches spanning a canyon
  de TP: Bögen, die eine Schlucht überspannen
  EN FP: a short attention span
  de FP: eine kurze Aufmerksamkeitsspanne
4906 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: Zelt
  EN TS: The tent is the only survivor.
  de TS: Das Zelt ist der einzige Überlebende.
  EN FS: The arch is the only survivor.
  de FS: Der Bogen ist der einzige Überlebende.
  EN TP: a white party tent
  de TP: ein weißes Partyzelt
  EN FP: a tent in the woods
  de FP: ein Zelt im Wald
4907 | speaker (noun): a device that converts signals into sounds | loc: Lautsprecher
  EN TS: Big speaker, dancing water.
  de TS: Großer Lautsprecher, tanzendes Wasser.
  EN FS: Big speaker, dancing milk.
  de FS: Großer Lautsprecher, tanzende Milch.
  EN TP: a big club speaker
  de TP: ein großer Club-Lautsprecher
  EN FP: a speaker at a conference
  de FP: ein Redner auf einer Konferenz
4908 | branch (noun): a stem growing out from a plant's main stem | loc: Ast
  EN TS: Someone is bending a branch.
  de TS: Jemand biegt einen Ast.
  EN FS: Someone is cutting a branch.
  de FS: Jemand schneidet einen Ast ab.
  EN TP: bending an apple branch
  de TP: einen Apfelbaumast biegen
  EN FP: a branch of a bank
  de FP: die Filiale einer Bank
4909 | famous (adjective): widely known and admired by people | loc: berühmt
  EN TS: People are filming her like she is famous.
  de TS: Die Leute filmen sie, als wäre sie berühmt.
  EN FS: People are painting her like she is famous.
  de FS: Die Leute malen sie, als wäre sie berühmt.
  EN TP: famous for a minute
  de TP: berühmt für eine Minute
  EN FP: famous for her songs
  de FP: berühmt für ihre Songs
4910 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: Schal
  EN TS: He is screaming in his team scarf!
  de TS: Er schreit in seinem Fanschal!
  EN FS: He is sleeping in his team scarf!
  de FS: Er schläft in seinem Fanschal!
  EN TP: a striped team scarf
  de TP: ein gestreifter Fanschal
  EN FP: a warm winter scarf
  de FP: ein warmer Winterschal
4911 | owner (noun): someone who owns a business | loc: Inhaber
  EN TS: She is the new owner!
  de TS: Sie ist die neue Inhaberin!
  EN FS: He is the new owner!
  de FS: Er ist der neue Inhaber!
  EN TP: the new cafe owner
  de TP: die neue Café-Inhaberin
  EN FP: the new cafe cook
  de FP: die neue Café-Köchin
4912 | instructor (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: Ausbilder
  EN TS: The instructor is kicking.
  de TS: Der Ausbilder tritt zu.
  EN FS: The instructor is dancing.
  de FS: Der Ausbilder tanzt.
  EN TP: a karate instructor
  de TP: ein Karate-Ausbilder
  EN FP: a driving instructor
  de FP: ein Fahrlehrer
4913 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: Armband
  EN TS: She is fastening a bracelet.
  de TS: Sie macht ein Armband zu.
  EN FS: She is fastening a necklace.
  de FS: Sie macht eine Halskette zu.
  EN TP: a woven beaded bracelet
  de TP: ein geflochtenes Perlenarmband
  EN FP: buying a gold bracelet
  de FP: ein goldenes Armband kaufen
4914 | guitar (noun): a stringed instrument with six strings | loc: Gitarre
  EN TS: Everyone loves the guitar guy.
  de TS: Alle lieben den Typen mit der Gitarre.
  EN FS: Everyone loves the drum guy.
  de FS: Alle lieben den Typen mit dem Schlagzeug.
  EN TP: playing an acoustic guitar
  de TP: auf der Akustikgitarre spielen
  EN FP: fixing an acoustic guitar
  de FP: eine Akustikgitarre reparieren
4915 | shoulder (noun): the body part between the neck and the arm | loc: Schulter
  EN TS: They are walking shoulder to shoulder.
  de TS: Sie gehen Schulter an Schulter.
  EN FS: They are sitting shoulder to shoulder.
  de FS: Sie sitzen Schulter an Schulter.
  EN TP: arms over shoulders
  de TP: Arme über den Schultern
  EN FP: a bag on the shoulder
  de FP: eine Tasche auf der Schulter
4916 | bicycle (noun): a vehicle with two wheels moved by pedals | loc: Fahrrad
  EN TS: We made it! Two bicycles, one sunset.
  de TS: Geschafft! Zwei Fahrräder, ein Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: We made it! Two scooters, one sunset.
  de FS: Geschafft! Zwei Roller, ein Sonnenuntergang.
  EN TP: bicycles on a pier
  de TP: Fahrräder auf einem Steg
  EN FP: bicycles on a train
  de FP: Fahrräder im Zug
4917 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: schießen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Red shot blue. Gotcha!
  de TS: Rot hat auf Blau geschossen. Erwischt!
  EN FS: Blue shot red. Gotcha!
  de FS: Blau hat auf Rot geschossen. Erwischt!
  EN TP: shooting paint at a player
  de TP: Farbe auf einen Spieler schießen
  EN FP: shooting a basketball
  de FP: einen Basketball werfen
4918 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: Treppe
  EN TS: He is climbing the stairs.
  de TS: Er steigt die Treppe hinauf.
  EN FS: He is sliding down the stairs.
  de FS: Er rutscht die Treppe hinunter.
  EN TP: up the stairs with bags
  de TP: mit Taschen die Treppe hoch
  EN FP: down the stairs alone
  de FP: allein die Treppe runter
4919 | membership (noun): being a member of a group | loc: Mitgliedschaft
  EN TS: She signed up for membership.
  de TS: Sie hat eine Mitgliedschaft abgeschlossen.
  EN FS: She signed up for yoga.
  de FS: Sie hat sich für Yoga angemeldet.
  EN TP: a photo club membership
  de TP: eine Fotoclub-Mitgliedschaft
  EN FP: a gym membership card
  de FP: eine Mitgliedskarte fürs Fitnessstudio
4920 | community (noun): people from one area who do things together | loc: Gemeinschaft
  EN TS: The community is cheering!
  de TS: Die Gemeinschaft jubelt!
  EN FS: The community is crying!
  de FS: Die Gemeinschaft weint!
  EN TP: a community garden sign
  de TP: ein Schild am Gemeinschaftsgarten
  EN FP: an online community
  de FP: eine Online-Community
4921 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: Pfad
  EN TS: The trail is full of roots.
  de TS: Der Pfad ist voller Wurzeln.
  EN FS: The trail is full of snow.
  de FS: Der Pfad ist voller Schnee.
  EN TP: a rough forest trail
  de TP: ein holpriger Waldpfad
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  de FP: eine Spur von Fußabdrücken
4922 | host (noun): the person who invites guests and cares for them | loc: Gastgeber
  EN TS: The host welcomes his guests.
  de TS: Der Gastgeber begrüßt seine Gäste.
  EN FS: The host ignores his guests.
  de FS: Der Gastgeber ignoriert seine Gäste.
  EN TP: a host raising his glass
  de TP: ein Gastgeber mit erhobenem Glas
  EN FP: a talk show host
  de FP: ein Talkshow-Moderator
4923 | seat (verb): to show someone to a seat | loc: platzieren
  EN TS: She is seating two guests.
  de TS: Sie platziert zwei Gäste.
  EN FS: She is seating four guests.
  de FS: Sie platziert vier Gäste.
  EN TP: seating a young couple
  de TP: ein junges Paar platzieren
  EN FP: seating herself at the bar
  de FP: sich selbst an die Bar setzen
4924 | familiar (adjective): easily recognized because you know it well | loc: vertraut
  EN TS: She sees a familiar face.
  de TS: Sie sieht ein vertrautes Gesicht.
  EN FS: She sees a familiar dog.
  de FS: Sie sieht einen vertrauten Hund.
  EN TP: a familiar face
  de TP: ein vertrautes Gesicht
  EN FP: a familiar song
  de FP: ein vertrauter Song
4925 | care (verb): to look after someone who needs care | loc: pflegen
  EN TS: She is caring for a patient.
  de TS: Sie pflegt einen Patienten.
  EN FS: She is caring for a baby.
  de FS: Sie pflegt ein Baby.
  EN TP: caring for a hospital patient
  de TP: einen Krankenhauspatienten pflegen
  EN FP: caring for a garden
  de FP: einen Garten pflegen
4926 | dentist (noun): a person whose job is to fix and clean teeth | loc: Zahnarzt
  EN TS: The dentist has a mirror.
  de TS: Der Zahnarzt hat einen Spiegel.
  EN FS: The dentist has a phone.
  de FS: Der Zahnarzt hat ein Handy.
  EN TP: a dentist with a mirror
  de TP: ein Zahnarzt mit Spiegel
  EN FP: a dentist pulling a tooth
  de FP: ein Zahnarzt zieht einen Zahn
4927 | lawyer (noun): a person whose job is to practice law | loc: Anwalt
  EN TS: The lawyer is shaking hands.
  de TS: Der Anwalt schüttelt Hände.
  EN FS: The lawyer is holding hands.
  de FS: Der Anwalt hält Händchen.
  EN TP: a lawyer with a briefcase
  de TP: ein Anwalt mit Aktentasche
  EN FP: a lawyer with a laptop
  de FP: ein Anwalt mit Laptop
4928 | to fix (verb): to put something broken back together | loc: reparieren
  EN TS: He fixed the leak himself!
  de TS: Er hat das Leck selbst repariert!
  EN FS: He fixed the car himself!
  de FS: Er hat das Auto selbst repariert!
  EN TP: fixing a leaking sink
  de TP: ein tropfendes Waschbecken reparieren
  EN FP: fixing a broken car
  de FP: ein kaputtes Auto reparieren
4929 | grade (noun): the value your school work is given | loc: Note
  EN TS: Guess who got a top grade!
  de TS: Rate mal, wer eine Top-Note bekommen hat!
  EN FS: Guess who got a bad grade!
  de FS: Rate mal, wer eine schlechte Note bekommen hat!
  EN TP: a top grade
  de TP: eine Top-Note
  EN FP: a bad grade
  de FP: eine schlechte Note
4930 | reward (noun): something you get for doing worthy acts | loc: Belohnung
  EN TS: Her reward is a gold star!
  de TS: Ihre Belohnung ist ein goldener Stern!
  EN FS: Her reward is a silver star!
  de FS: Ihre Belohnung ist ein silberner Stern!
  EN TP: a gold star reward
  de TP: ein goldener Stern als Belohnung
  EN FP: a reward for lost keys
  de FP: eine Belohnung für verlorene Schlüssel
4931 | diagram (noun): a drawing that explains how something works | loc: Diagramm
  EN TS: She is explaining a diagram.
  de TS: Sie erklärt ein Diagramm.
  EN FS: She is explaining a poem.
  de FS: Sie erklärt ein Gedicht.
  EN TP: a chalk diagram
  de TP: ein Diagramm aus Kreide
  EN FP: a textbook diagram
  de FP: ein Diagramm im Schulbuch
4932 | to steer (verb): to turn a wheel to control where a boat goes | loc: steuern
  EN TS: Cool cap! She is steering a taxi.
  de TS: Coole Mütze! Sie steuert ein Taxi.
  EN FS: Cool cap! She is steering a boat.
  de FS: Coole Mütze! Sie steuert ein Boot.
  EN TP: steering a yellow taxi
  de TP: ein gelbes Taxi steuern
  EN FP: steering a yellow boat
  de FP: ein gelbes Boot steuern
4933 | wheel (noun): a round frame that turns on an axle | loc: Rad
  EN TS: One hand stays on the wheel.
  de TS: Eine Hand bleibt am Lenkrad.
  EN FS: One hand stays on the phone.
  de FS: Eine Hand bleibt am Handy.
  EN TP: a bus steering wheel
  de TP: ein Bus-Lenkrad
  EN FP: a bus spare wheel
  de FP: ein Bus-Ersatzrad
4934 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: Headset
  EN TS: She is putting on a headset.
  de TS: Sie setzt ein Headset auf.
  EN FS: She is putting on a helmet.
  de FS: Sie setzt einen Helm auf.
  EN TP: a green pilot headset
  de TP: ein grünes Piloten-Headset
  EN FP: a VR headset for games
  de FP: ein VR-Headset zum Zocken
4935 | compass (noun): an instrument whose needle shows you north | loc: Kompass
  EN TS: She is touching the compass.
  de TS: Sie berührt den Kompass.
  EN FS: She is touching the radio.
  de FS: Sie berührt das Funkgerät.
  EN TP: a brass ship's compass
  de TP: ein Schiffskompass aus Messing
  EN FP: a compass for drawing circles
  de FP: ein Zirkel zum Kreiszeichnen
4936 | kitchen (noun): a room equipped for preparing meals | loc: Küche
  EN TS: She is cooking in a kitchen.
  de TS: Sie kocht in einer Küche.
  EN FS: She is cooking in a garden.
  de FS: Sie kocht in einem Garten.
  EN TP: a professional kitchen
  de TP: eine Profiküche
  EN FP: a home kitchen
  de FP: eine Küche zu Hause
4937 | ring (verb): to sound loudly, like a bell | loc: klingeln
  EN TS: He is ringing the bell.
  de TS: Er klingelt mit der Tischglocke.
  EN FS: He is ringing the doorbell.
  de FS: Er klingelt an der Haustür.
  EN TP: ringing the service bell
  de TP: mit der Serviceglocke klingeln
  EN FP: ringing a friend
  de FP: einen Freund anrufen
4938 | waitress (noun): a woman who serves food to guests in a restaurant | loc: Kellnerin
  EN TS: She's a busy waitress.
  de TS: Sie ist eine vielbeschäftigte Kellnerin.
  EN FS: She's a busy nurse.
  de FS: Sie ist eine vielbeschäftigte Pflegerin.
  EN TP: a waitress on a terrace
  de TP: eine Kellnerin auf einer Terrasse
  EN FP: a waitress in a kitchen
  de FP: eine Kellnerin in der Küche
4939 | golden (adjective): shining with the bright yellow colour of gold | loc: golden
  EN TS: Golden crust. Nice work, baker.
  de TS: Goldene Kruste. Starke Arbeit, Bäcker.
  EN FS: Burnt crust. Great work, baker.
  de FS: Verbrannte Kruste. Starke Arbeit, Bäcker.
  EN TP: golden brown croissants
  de TP: goldbraune Croissants
  EN FP: a golden wedding ring
  de FP: ein goldener Ehering
4940 | butcher (noun): a person who cuts and sells meat | loc: Metzger
  EN TS: The butcher is wrapping meat.
  de TS: Der Metzger wickelt Fleisch ein.
  EN FS: The butcher is wrapping gifts.
  de FS: Der Metzger wickelt Geschenke ein.
  EN TP: a butcher wrapping steak
  de TP: ein Metzger wickelt Steak ein
  EN FP: a butcher cutting chicken
  de FP: ein Metzger zerlegt ein Hähnchen
4941 | firefighter (noun): a person whose job is putting out fires | loc: Feuerwehrmann
  EN TS: The firefighter saved a cat!
  de TS: Der Feuerwehrmann hat eine Katze gerettet!
  EN FS: The firefighter saved a dog!
  de FS: Der Feuerwehrmann hat einen Hund gerettet!
  EN TP: a firefighter saving a cat
  de TP: ein Feuerwehrmann rettet eine Katze
  EN FP: a firefighter fighting a fire
  de FP: ein Feuerwehrmann löscht ein Feuer
4942 | luggage (noun): bags you carry your things in when traveling | loc: Gepäck
  EN TS: One bag of luggage? Legend!
  de TS: Nur eine Tasche Gepäck? Legende!
  EN FS: Five bags of luggage? Legend!
  de FS: Fünf Taschen Gepäck? Legende!
  EN TP: luggage over his shoulder
  de TP: Gepäck über der Schulter
  EN FP: luggage on a trolley
  de FP: Gepäck auf einem Kofferwagen
4943 | praise (noun): words or clapping that show approval | loc: Lob
  EN TS: He loves all this praise.
  de TS: Er liebt das ganze Lob.
  EN FS: He hates all this praise.
  de FS: Er hasst das ganze Lob.
  EN TP: praise from the film crew
  de TP: Lob vom Filmteam
  EN FP: praise from his teacher
  de FP: Lob von seinem Lehrer
4944 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: Ballkleid
  EN TS: Spotlight, roses and a gold gown!
  de TS: Scheinwerfer, Rosen und ein goldenes Ballkleid!
  EN FS: Spotlight, roses and a red gown!
  de FS: Scheinwerfer, Rosen und ein rotes Ballkleid!
  EN TP: a long pale-gold gown
  de TP: ein langes blassgoldenes Ballkleid
  EN FP: trying on a wedding gown
  de FP: ein Brautkleid anprobieren
4945 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: singen
  EN TS: She is singing into the mic.
  de TS: Sie singt ins Mikro.
  EN FS: She is singing into a phone.
  de FS: Sie singt in ein Handy.
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  de TP: in ein Mikrofon singen
  EN FP: singing in a choir
  de FP: im Chor singen
4946 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: Pferdeschwanz
  EN TS: Her ponytail is dancing too.
  de TS: Ihr Pferdeschwanz tanzt auch mit.
  EN FS: Her scarf is dancing too.
  de FS: Ihr Schal tanzt auch mit.
  EN TP: a swinging ponytail
  de TP: ein wippender Pferdeschwanz
  EN FP: a ponytail under a cap
  de FP: ein Pferdeschwanz unter einer Cap
4947 | portrait (noun): a picture that shows a person's face | loc: Porträt
  EN TS: Portrait done. Arms up!
  de TS: Porträt fertig. Arme hoch!
  EN FS: Landscape done. Arms up!
  de FS: Landschaft fertig. Arme hoch!
  EN TP: a finished portrait
  de TP: ein fertiges Porträt
  EN FP: a portrait of a cat
  de FP: ein Porträt einer Katze
4948 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: Skyline
  EN TS: Make-up with a skyline view. Fancy.
  de TS: Make-up mit Skyline-Blick. Schick.
  EN FS: Make-up with a beach view. Fancy.
  de FS: Make-up mit Strandblick. Schick.
  EN TP: a city skyline behind her
  de TP: eine Skyline hinter ihr
  EN FP: a skyline at sunset
  de FP: eine Skyline bei Sonnenuntergang
4949 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: Landschaft
  EN TS: Snowy peaks: amazing scenery.
  de TS: Verschneite Gipfel: eine traumhafte Landschaft.
  EN FS: Sandy dunes: amazing scenery.
  de FS: Sandige Dünen: eine traumhafte Landschaft.
  EN TP: mountain scenery from the top
  de TP: Berglandschaft vom Gipfel aus
  EN FP: scenery from a train window
  de FP: Landschaft aus dem Zugfenster
4950 | hip (noun): the part where the leg joins the waist | loc: Hüfte
  EN TS: Hands on hips. Very serious.
  de TS: Hände in die Hüften. Sehr ernst.
  EN FS: Hands on heads. Very serious.
  de FS: Hände auf den Kopf. Sehr ernst.
  EN TP: hands on the hips
  de TP: die Hände in den Hüften
  EN FP: swinging the hips
  de FP: die Hüften schwingen
4951 | home (adverb): to the place where your home is | loc: nach Hause
  EN TS: He is home, and the dog is happy!
  de TS: Er kommt nach Hause, und der Hund ist überglücklich!
  EN FS: He is home, and the cat is happy!
  de FS: Er kommt nach Hause, und die Katze ist überglücklich!
  EN TP: coming home to the dog
  de TP: nach Hause zum Hund kommen
  EN FP: leaving home for work
  de FP: von zu Hause zur Arbeit gehen
4952 | bed (noun): the piece of furniture you sleep on | loc: Bett
  EN TS: He missed his bed so much.
  de TS: Er hat sein Bett so vermisst.
  EN FS: He missed his car so much.
  de FS: Er hat sein Auto so vermisst.
  EN TP: dropping onto the bed
  de TP: sich aufs Bett fallen lassen
  EN FP: making the bed
  de FP: das Bett machen
4953 | hope (verb): to wish for something and expect it to happen | loc: hoffen
  EN TS: She is hoping for photosynthesis.
  de TS: Sie hofft auf Photosynthese.
  EN FS: She is hoping for a thunderstorm.
  de FS: Sie hofft auf ein Gewitter.
  EN TP: hoping for a sprout
  de TP: auf einen Keimling hoffen
  EN FP: hoping for a rainbow
  de FP: auf einen Regenbogen hoffen
4954 | visit (noun): going to see someone for a short time | loc: Besuch
  EN TS: The visit makes her so happy!
  de TS: Der Besuch macht sie so glücklich!
  EN FS: The visit makes her so sad!
  de FS: Der Besuch macht sie so traurig!
  EN TP: a hospital visit
  de TP: ein Krankenhausbesuch
  EN FP: a visit to the zoo
  de FP: ein Besuch im Zoo
4955 | locker (noun): a storage box for your clothes and valuables | loc: Spind
  EN TS: Only the lockers look tidy here.
  de TS: Nur die Spinde sehen hier ordentlich aus.
  EN FS: Only the bunk beds look tidy here.
  de FS: Nur die Stockbetten sehen hier ordentlich aus.
  EN TP: a row of grey lockers
  de TP: eine Reihe grauer Spinde
  EN FP: a locker at a pool
  de FP: ein Spind im Schwimmbad
4956 | reception (noun): the front desk where guests check in | loc: Rezeption
  EN TS: She is walking to reception.
  de TS: Sie geht zur Rezeption.
  EN FS: She is walking to the kitchen.
  de FS: Sie geht in die Küche.
  EN TP: the hostel reception desk
  de TP: die Rezeption im Hostel
  EN FP: a wedding reception
  de FP: ein Hochzeitsempfang
4957 | hotel (noun): a building where travelers pay to stay | loc: Hotel
  EN TS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 2,000 EUR.
  de TS: Die Hotels kosten von billig bis 2.000 EUR.
  EN FS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 20 EUR.
  de FS: Die Hotels kosten von billig bis 20 EUR.
  EN TP: three kinds of hotel
  de TP: drei Arten von Hotels
  EN FP: a hotel by the sea
  de FP: ein Hotel am Meer
4958 | villa (noun): a large, expensive house with a garden | loc: Villa
  EN TS: From a hut to a glass villa!
  de TS: Von der Hütte zur Villa aus Glas!
  EN FS: From a hut to a wooden villa!
  de FS: Von der Hütte zur Villa aus Holz!
  EN TP: a huge glass villa
  de TP: eine riesige Villa aus Glas
  EN FP: a holiday villa for rent
  de FP: eine Ferienvilla zur Miete
4959 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: Häuschen
  EN TS: A cottage with a sunflower.
  de TS: Ein Häuschen mit einer Sonnenblume.
  EN FS: A cottage with an apple tree.
  de FS: Ein Häuschen mit einem Apfelbaum.
  EN TP: a small wooden cottage
  de TP: ein kleines Häuschen aus Holz
  EN FP: a cottage by a lake
  de FP: ein Häuschen am See
4960 | cuddle (verb): to hold someone close in a soft, loving way | loc: kuscheln
  EN TS: They are cuddling at arrivals!
  de TS: Sie kuscheln in der Ankunftshalle!
  EN FS: They are fighting at arrivals!
  de FS: Sie streiten in der Ankunftshalle!
  EN TP: a group cuddle at arrivals
  de TP: Gruppenkuscheln in der Ankunftshalle
  EN FP: cuddling a teddy bear
  de FP: mit einem Teddybär kuscheln
4961 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: Haustier
  EN TS: The pet is hunting a toy.
  de TS: Das Haustier jagt ein Spielzeug.
  EN FS: The pet is hunting a ball.
  de FS: Das Haustier jagt einen Ball.
  EN TP: a pet cat hunting
  de TP: ein jagendes Haustier
  EN FP: a pet cat sleeping
  de FP: ein schlafendes Haustier
4962 | binoculars (noun): double lenses for seeing far-away things | loc: Fernglas
  EN TS: He is using binoculars. Deer alert!
  de TS: Er benutzt ein Fernglas. Hirsch-Alarm!
  EN FS: He is using a telescope. Deer alert!
  de FS: Er benutzt ein Teleskop. Hirsch-Alarm!
  EN TP: looking through binoculars
  de TP: durch ein Fernglas schauen
  EN FP: binoculars at the opera
  de FP: ein Fernglas in der Oper
4963 | finger (noun): any of the long parts on your hand, not the thumb | loc: Finger
  EN TS: She hurt her finger, then her toe!
  de TS: Erst hat sie sich den Finger verletzt, dann den Zeh!
  EN FS: She hurt her finger, then her ear!
  de FS: Erst hat sie sich den Finger verletzt, dann das Ohr!
  EN TP: a hurt finger
  de TP: ein verletzter Finger
  EN FP: pointing a finger at him
  de FP: mit dem Finger auf ihn zeigen
4964 | to taste (verb): to taste a little of something | loc: probieren
  EN TS: Soup to taste, then flowers. Smooth.
  de TS: Erst Suppe probieren, dann Blumen. Charmant.
  EN FS: Soup to taste, then chocolate. Smooth.
  de FS: Erst Suppe probieren, dann Schokolade. Charmant.
  EN TP: tasting soup from a spoon
  de TP: Suppe vom Löffel probieren
  EN FP: tasting wine at a party
  de FP: Wein auf einer Party probieren
4965 | bathroom (noun): a room with a bath or shower and a washbasin | loc: Badezimmer
  EN TS: The bathroom routine is done.
  de TS: Die Badezimmer-Routine ist erledigt.
  EN FS: The kitchen routine is done.
  de FS: Die Küchen-Routine ist erledigt.
  EN TP: brushing teeth in the bathroom
  de TP: im Badezimmer Zähne putzen
  EN FP: singing in the bathroom
  de FP: im Badezimmer singen
4966 | split (verb): to separate something into parts | loc: spalten
  EN TS: The ice split in two.
  de TS: Das Eis hat sich in zwei Teile gespalten.
  EN FS: The ice split in three.
  de FS: Das Eis hat sich in drei Teile gespalten.
  EN TP: splitting a slab of ice
  de TP: eine Eisplatte spalten
  EN FP: splitting a log of wood
  de FP: einen Holzklotz spalten
4967 | identity (noun): the characteristics by which a person is known | loc: Identität
  EN TS: A scan checks her identity.
  de TS: Ein Scan prüft ihre Identität.
  EN FS: A scan checks her luggage.
  de FS: Ein Scan prüft ihr Gepäck.
  EN TP: checking her identity
  de TP: ihre Identität prüfen
  EN FP: hiding her identity
  de FP: ihre Identität verbergen
4968 | card (noun): a card that shows your identity | loc: Ausweis
  EN TS: She got her new ID card!
  de TS: Sie hat ihren neuen Ausweis!
  EN FS: She got her new phone!
  de FS: Sie hat ihr neues Handy!
  EN TP: a new identity card
  de TP: ein neuer Personalausweis
  EN FP: a new birthday card
  de FP: eine neue Geburtstagskarte
4969 | cafe (noun): a small restaurant selling drinks and snacks | loc: Café
  EN TS: At the cafe, her book wins.
  de TS: Im Café gewinnt ihr Buch.
  EN FS: At the cafe, his phone wins.
  de FS: Im Café gewinnt sein Handy.
  EN TP: reading at a cafe table
  de TP: Lesen an einem Tisch im Café
  EN FP: working in a cafe kitchen
  de FP: Arbeiten in einer Café-Küche
4970 | independence (noun): freedom from the control of others | loc: Unabhängigkeit
  EN TS: Fireworks for independence!
  de TS: Feuerwerk für die Unabhängigkeit!
  EN FS: Candles for independence!
  de FS: Kerzen für die Unabhängigkeit!
  EN TP: celebrating independence
  de TP: die Unabhängigkeit feiern
  EN FP: fighting for independence
  de FP: für die Unabhängigkeit kämpfen
4971 | fireworks (noun): things that explode in the sky with colour | loc: Feuerwerk
  EN TS: Fireworks light up the dome.
  de TS: Feuerwerk erleuchtet die Kuppel.
  EN FS: Fireworks light up the bridge.
  de FS: Feuerwerk erleuchtet die Brücke.
  EN TP: fireworks over a dome
  de TP: Feuerwerk über einer Kuppel
  EN FP: fireworks over a lake
  de FP: Feuerwerk über einem See
4972 | patriotic (adjective): inspired by love for your country | loc: patriotisch
  EN TS: What a patriotic night!
  de TS: Was für eine patriotische Nacht!
  EN FS: What a patriotic morning!
  de FS: Was für ein patriotischer Morgen!
  EN TP: a patriotic crowd
  de TP: eine patriotische Menge
  EN FP: a patriotic army parade
  de FP: eine patriotische Militärparade
4973 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: Denkmal
  EN TS: He is posing at a monument.
  de TS: Er posiert an einem Denkmal.
  EN FS: He is posing at a waterfall.
  de FS: Er posiert an einem Wasserfall.
  EN TP: posing at a white monument
  de TP: Posieren an einem weißen Denkmal
  EN FP: a monument on a mountain
  de FP: ein Denkmal auf einem Berg
4974 | seller (noun): someone who exchanges goods for money | loc: Verkäufer
  EN TS: The seller is pouring like a pro.
  de TS: Der Verkäufer schenkt ein wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: The seller is juggling like a pro.
  de FS: Der Verkäufer jongliert wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: a tea seller pouring
  de TP: ein Teeverkäufer beim Einschenken
  EN FP: a seller of flowers
  de FP: ein Blumenverkäufer
4975 | different (adjective): unlike something else in nature or quality | loc: anders
  EN TS: Her style is so different!
  de TS: Ihr Style ist so anders!
  EN FS: His style is so different!
  de FS: Sein Style ist so anders!
  EN TP: different from the crowd
  de TP: anders als die Masse
  EN FP: different from her sister
  de FP: anders als ihre Schwester
4976 | wade (verb): to walk through shallow water | loc: waten
  EN TS: He is wading through water.
  de TS: Er watet durchs Wasser.
  EN FS: He is wading through snow.
  de FS: Er watet durch Schnee.
  EN TP: wading in rice fields
  de TP: durch Reisfelder waten
  EN FP: wading in deep snow
  de FP: durch tiefen Schnee waten
4977 | hand (noun): the end of the limb you grab things with | loc: Hand
  EN TS: A hand is leading the way.
  de TS: Eine Hand zeigt den Weg.
  EN FS: A dog is leading the way.
  de FS: Ein Hund zeigt den Weg.
  EN TP: an outstretched open hand
  de TP: eine ausgestreckte offene Hand
  EN FP: a hand full of rice
  de FP: eine Hand voll Reis
4978 | cook (noun): someone who cooks food | loc: Koch
  EN TS: The cook is playing with fire!
  de TS: Der Koch spielt mit dem Feuer!
  EN FS: The cook is playing with ice!
  de FS: Der Koch spielt mit Eis!
  EN TP: a cook at a wok
  de TP: ein Koch am Wok
  EN FP: a cook at a grill
  de FP: ein Koch am Grill
4979 | office (noun): a place of business where people do office work | loc: Büro
  EN TS: The whole office is sick!
  de TS: Das ganze Büro ist krank!
  EN FS: The whole office is asleep!
  de FS: Das ganze Büro schläft!
  EN TP: coughing in the office
  de TP: Husten im Büro
  EN FP: singing in the office
  de FP: Singen im Büro
4980 | to breathe (verb): to draw air into your lungs and let it out | loc: atmen
  EN TS: They are breathing in deeply.
  de TS: Sie atmen tief ein.
  EN FS: They are shouting out loudly.
  de FS: Sie schreien laut.
  EN TP: to breathe in fresh air
  de TP: frische Luft atmen
  EN FP: to breathe under water
  de FP: unter Wasser atmen
4981 | vaccine (noun): an injection that protects you from a disease | loc: der Impfstoff
  EN TS: Everyone got the vaccine. Yay!
  de TS: Alle haben den Impfstoff bekommen. Juhu!
  EN FS: Nobody got the vaccine. Yay!
  de FS: Keiner hat den Impfstoff bekommen. Juhu!
  EN TP: vaccines in upper arms
  de TP: Impfstoff in die Oberarme
  EN FP: a vaccine in the leg
  de FP: ein Impfstoff ins Bein
4982 | ankle (noun): the joint between your leg and your foot | loc: Knöchel
  EN TS: He is holding his ankle.
  de TS: Er hält sich den Knöchel.
  EN FS: He is holding his head.
  de FS: Er hält sich den Kopf.
  EN TP: a hurt ankle
  de TP: ein verletzter Knöchel
  EN FP: a bracelet on the ankle
  de FP: ein Kettchen am Knöchel
4983 | officer (noun): a person who holds a position of authority | loc: Offizier
  EN TS: The officer is checking everything, even under the van.
  de TS: Der Offizier kontrolliert alles, sogar unter dem Van.
  EN FS: The officer is checking everything, even under the bus.
  de FS: Der Offizier kontrolliert alles, sogar unter dem Bus.
  EN TP: an officer checking a van
  de TP: ein Offizier kontrolliert einen Van
  EN FP: an officer on a ship
  de FP: ein Offizier auf einem Schiff
4984 | briefcase (noun): a stiff flat case for carrying papers | loc: Aktentasche
  EN TS: Briefcase in hand, he's skating!
  de TS: Aktentasche in der Hand, und er skatet!
  EN FS: Coffee cup in hand, he's skating!
  de FS: Kaffeebecher in der Hand, und er skatet!
  EN TP: skating with a briefcase
  de TP: mit Aktentasche skaten
  EN FP: a briefcase full of papers
  de FP: eine Aktentasche voller Papiere
4985 | fix (verb): to attach something firmly in place | loc: befestigen
  EN TS: The screens are fixed in place.
  de TS: Die Bildschirme sind fest befestigt.
  EN FS: The mirrors are fixed in place.
  de FS: Die Spiegel sind fest befestigt.
  EN TP: fixing screens to the wall
  de TP: Bildschirme an der Wand befestigen
  EN FP: fixing a meeting date
  de FP: einen Termin festlegen
4986 | bright (adjective): giving off a lot of light | loc: hell
  EN TS: The wall is a bit bright.
  de TS: Die Wand ist ein bisschen hell.
  EN FS: The wall is a bit dark.
  de FS: Die Wand ist ein bisschen dunkel.
  EN TP: bright blue screens
  de TP: hellblaue Bildschirme
  EN FP: a bright sunny day
  de FP: ein heller Sonnentag
4987 | present (verb): to give an exhibition of work to an audience | loc: präsentieren
  EN TS: She presented. Coffee won.
  de TS: Sie hat präsentiert. Der Kaffee hat gewonnen.
  EN FS: She presented. Pizza won.
  de FS: Sie hat präsentiert. Die Pizza hat gewonnen.
  EN TP: presenting her work
  de TP: ihre Arbeit präsentieren
  EN FP: presenting a TV show
  de FP: eine TV-Show präsentieren
4988 | attack (noun): a military move against an enemy with weapons | loc: der Angriff
  EN TS: The attack is starting!
  de TS: Der Angriff beginnt!
  EN FS: The picnic is starting!
  de FS: Das Picknick beginnt!
  EN TP: a medieval attack
  de TP: ein mittelalterlicher Angriff
  EN FP: a heart attack
  de FP: ein Herzinfarkt
4989 | hill (noun): a raised piece of land, smaller than a mountain | loc: Hügel
  EN TS: They are storming down the hill!
  de TS: Sie stürmen den Hügel hinunter!
  EN FS: They are storming down the road!
  de FS: Sie stürmen die Straße hinunter!
  EN TP: charging down a hill
  de TP: den Hügel hinunterstürmen
  EN FP: rolling down a hill
  de FP: den Hügel hinunterrollen
4990 | iron (noun): the hot tool for pressing clothes smooth | loc: Bügeleisen
  EN TS: He is using a heavy iron.
  de TS: Er benutzt ein schweres Bügeleisen.
  EN FS: He is using a heavy hammer.
  de FS: Er benutzt einen schweren Hammer.
  EN TP: a heavy steam iron
  de TP: ein schweres Dampfbügeleisen
  EN FP: an iron pan
  de FP: eine Eisenpfanne
4991 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: zerzaust | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc zerzaust fits hair only; used chaotisch for a messy pile
  EN TS: What a messy pile of clothes!
  de TS: Was für ein chaotischer Klamottenhaufen!
  EN FS: What a messy pile of books!
  de FS: Was für ein chaotischer Bücherhaufen!
  EN TP: a messy pile of clothes
  de TP: ein chaotischer Kleiderhaufen
  EN FP: a messy kitchen table
  de FP: ein chaotischer Küchentisch
4992 | busy (adjective): fully occupied with what you are doing | loc: beschäftigt
  EN TS: So much ironing! She is busy.
  de TS: So viel Bügelwäsche! Sie ist beschäftigt.
  EN FS: So much cooking! She is busy.
  de FS: So viel zu kochen! Sie ist beschäftigt.
  EN TP: busy with the ironing
  de TP: mit dem Bügeln beschäftigt
  EN FP: busy with the dishes
  de FP: mit dem Abwasch beschäftigt
4993 | alone (adjective): kept apart from others, on your own | loc: allein
  EN TS: She is all alone on the lake.
  de TS: Sie ist ganz allein auf dem See.
  EN FS: She is all alone on the beach.
  de FS: Sie ist ganz allein am Strand.
  EN TP: alone on a tiny island
  de TP: allein auf einer winzigen Insel
  EN FP: alone in a big city
  de FP: allein in einer Großstadt
4994 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: hölzern
  EN TS: She is using a wooden spoon.
  de TS: Sie benutzt einen hölzernen Löffel.
  EN FS: She is using a metal spoon.
  de FS: Sie benutzt einen metallenen Löffel.
  EN TP: a long wooden spoon
  de TP: ein langer hölzerner Löffel
  EN FP: a wooden chopping board
  de FP: ein hölzernes Schneidebrett
4995 | sculpture (noun): a three-dimensional work of art | loc: Skulptur
  EN TS: A fountain with a sculpture.
  de TS: Ein Brunnen mit einer Skulptur.
  EN FS: A fountain with a clock.
  de FS: Ein Brunnen mit einer Uhr.
  EN TP: a stone fountain sculpture
  de TP: eine steinerne Brunnenskulptur
  EN FP: a wedding ice sculpture
  de FP: eine Eisskulptur für eine Hochzeit
4996 | cone (noun): any cone-shaped object you can hold | loc: Tüte
  EN TS: Pigeons love her ice cream cone.
  de TS: Die Tauben lieben ihre Eistüte.
  EN FS: Seagulls love her ice cream cone.
  de FS: Die Möwen lieben ihre Eistüte.
  EN TP: an ice cream cone
  de TP: eine Eistüte
  EN FP: an orange traffic cone
  de FP: ein orangefarbener Leitkegel
4997 | laugh (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: Lachen
  EN TS: He has a loud laugh.
  de TS: Er hat ein lautes Lachen.
  EN FS: He has a quiet laugh.
  de FS: Er hat ein leises Lachen.
  EN TP: a laugh at the Colosseum
  de TP: ein Lachen am Kolosseum
  EN FP: a laugh in Paris
  de FP: ein Lachen in Paris
4998 | tunnel (noun): a passage cut under the ground for traffic | loc: der Tunnel
  EN TS: The tunnel is made of gates.
  de TS: Der Tunnel besteht aus Toren.
  EN FS: The tunnel is made of trees.
  de FS: Der Tunnel besteht aus Bäumen.
  EN TP: a tunnel of shrine gates
  de TP: ein Tunnel aus Schreintoren
  EN FP: a tunnel under the sea
  de FP: ein Tunnel unter dem Meer
4999 | combat (verb): to battle against someone in a fight | loc: kämpfen
  EN TS: He's combating a swordsman.
  de TS: Er kämpft gegen einen Schwertkämpfer.
  EN FS: He's combating an archer.
  de FS: Er kämpft gegen einen Bogenschützen.
  EN TP: combating a swordsman
  de TP: gegen einen Schwertkämpfer kämpfen
  EN FP: combating a bad cold
  de FP: gegen eine Erkältung kämpfen
5000 | thin (adjective): not thick from one surface to the other | loc: dünn
  EN TS: His thin slices look perfect.
  de TS: Seine dünnen Scheiben sehen perfekt aus.
  EN FS: His thick slices look perfect.
  de FS: Seine dicken Scheiben sehen perfekt aus.
  EN TP: thin slices of fish
  de TP: dünne Scheiben Fisch
  EN FP: thin slices of bread
  de FP: dünne Scheiben Brot
5001 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: Landschaft
  EN TS: Worth it for this landscape.
  de TS: Für diese Landschaft hat sich's gelohnt.
  EN FS: Worth it for this beach.
  de FS: Für diesen Strand hat sich's gelohnt.
  EN TP: a mountain landscape
  de TP: eine Berglandschaft
  EN FP: a landscape painting
  de FP: ein Landschaftsgemälde
5002 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: Dämmerung
  EN TS: They are jumping in at dusk.
  de TS: Sie springen in der Dämmerung rein.
  EN FS: They are jumping in at noon.
  de FS: Sie springen am Mittag rein.
  EN TP: a forest lake at dusk
  de TP: ein Waldsee in der Dämmerung
  EN FP: dusk in a big city
  de FP: Dämmerung in der Großstadt
5003 | explorer (noun): someone who travels into little known places | loc: Entdecker
  EN TS: An explorer is cutting a path.
  de TS: Ein Entdecker schlägt sich einen Pfad frei.
  EN FS: An explorer is cutting a tree.
  de FS: Ein Entdecker schlägt einen Baum um.
  EN TP: an explorer with a machete
  de TP: ein Entdecker mit Machete
  EN FP: an explorer with a map
  de FP: ein Entdecker mit Landkarte
5004 | spring (verb): to move forward in big leaps | loc: springen
  EN TS: The kangaroo is springing forward.
  de TS: Das Känguru springt nach vorne.
  EN FS: The kangaroo is springing backward.
  de FS: Das Känguru springt nach hinten.
  EN TP: to spring across the sand
  de TP: über den Sand springen
  EN FP: to spring out of bed
  de FP: aus dem Bett springen
5005 | bay (noun): a part of the sea curving into the land | loc: Bucht
  EN TS: She sees everything in this bay.
  de TS: Sie sieht alles in dieser Bucht.
  EN FS: She sees everything in this park.
  de FS: Sie sieht alles in diesem Park.
  EN TP: boats in a quiet bay
  de TP: Boote in einer ruhigen Bucht
  EN FP: a bay full of ice
  de FP: eine Bucht voller Eis
5006 | kettle (noun): the pot you boil water in for tea or coffee | loc: Wasserkocher
  EN TS: Her kettle is working hard.
  de TS: Ihr Wasserkocher schuftet.
  EN FS: Her toaster is working hard.
  de FS: Ihr Toaster schuftet.
  EN TP: boiling water in a kettle
  de TP: Wasser im Wasserkocher kochen
  EN FP: a kettle on a fire
  de FP: ein Wasserkocher über dem Feuer
5007 | lock (noun): a fastener on a door that keeps it closed | loc: Schloss
  EN TS: Yes! Her key is in the lock!
  de TS: Ja! Ihr Schlüssel steckt im Schloss!
  EN FS: Yes! Her key is in the car!
  de FS: Ja! Ihr Schlüssel steckt im Auto!
  EN TP: a key in the lock
  de TP: ein Schlüssel im Schloss
  EN FP: a lock on a bike
  de FP: ein Schloss am Fahrrad
5008 | unlock (verb): to open the lock of something with a key | loc: aufschließen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She unlocked the wooden door.
  de TS: Sie hat die Holztür aufgeschlossen.
  EN FS: She unlocked the garage door.
  de FS: Sie hat die Garagentür aufgeschlossen.
  EN TP: to unlock the wooden door
  de TP: die Holztür aufschließen
  EN FP: to unlock a phone
  de FP: ein Handy entsperren
5009 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: Kind
  EN TS: The child is sliding down.
  de TS: Das Kind rutscht runter.
  EN FS: The child is climbing up.
  de FS: Das Kind klettert hoch.
  EN TP: a child on a slide
  de TP: ein Kind auf einer Rutsche
  EN FP: a child on a swing
  de FP: ein Kind auf einer Schaukel
5010 | king (noun): a man who rules a kingdom | loc: König
  EN TS: Long live the king!
  de TS: Lang lebe der König!
  EN FS: Long live the queen!
  de FS: Lang lebe die Königin!
  EN TP: a king on a balcony
  de TP: ein König auf einem Balkon
  EN FP: a king on a horse
  de FP: ein König auf einem Pferd
5011 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: alt
  EN TS: The old couple is kissing, how cute!
  de TS: Das alte Paar küsst sich, wie süß!
  EN FS: The old couple is dancing, how cute!
  de FS: Das alte Paar tanzt, wie süß!
  EN TP: an old couple kissing
  de TP: ein altes Paar beim Küssen
  EN FP: an old couple dancing
  de FP: ein altes Paar beim Tanzen
5012 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: Romanze
  EN TS: Paris is full of romance!
  de TS: Paris ist voller Romanze!
  EN FS: Paris is full of snow!
  de FS: Paris ist voller Schnee!
  EN TP: romance in Paris
  de TP: Romanze in Paris
  EN FP: a romance novel
  de FP: ein Liebesroman
5013 | cheap (adjective): low in price, not costing much | loc: billig
  EN TS: The cheap kitchen is old.
  de TS: Die billige Küche ist alt.
  EN FS: The cheap kitchen is huge.
  de FS: Die billige Küche ist riesig.
  EN TP: a cheap old kitchen
  de TP: eine billige alte Küche
  EN FP: a cheap fast car
  de FP: ein billiges schnelles Auto
5014 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: reich
  EN TS: The rich cook has the best view.
  de TS: Der reiche Koch hat die beste Aussicht.
  EN FS: The rich cook has the best dog.
  de FS: Der reiche Koch hat den besten Hund.
  EN TP: a rich man's kitchen
  de TP: die Küche eines reichen Mannes
  EN FP: a rich man's car
  de FP: das Auto eines reichen Mannes
5015 | homemade (adjective): made at home by yourself, not bought | loc: hausgemacht
  EN TS: Homemade bread, made by hand.
  de TS: Hausgemachtes Brot, von Hand gemacht.
  EN FS: Homemade pasta, made by hand.
  de FS: Hausgemachte Pasta, von Hand gemacht.
  EN TP: a homemade loaf of bread
  de TP: ein hausgemachter Brotlaib
  EN FP: homemade jam in jars
  de FP: hausgemachte Marmelade im Glas
5016 | knee (noun): the joint in the middle of your leg | loc: Knie
  EN TS: He is bending his knees.
  de TS: Er beugt die Knie.
  EN FS: He is bending his arms.
  de FS: Er beugt die Arme.
  EN TP: bare knees in a squat
  de TP: nackte Knie in der Hocke
  EN FP: down on one knee
  de FP: auf einem Knie
5017 | cut (adjective): separated into pieces with a sharp knife | loc: geschnitten
  EN TS: A rainbow of cut vegetables!
  de TS: Ein Regenbogen aus geschnittenem Gemüse!
  EN FS: A rainbow of cut fruit!
  de FS: Ein Regenbogen aus geschnittenem Obst!
  EN TP: cut vegetables in rows
  de TP: geschnittenes Gemüse in Reihen
  EN FP: cut flowers in a vase
  de FP: geschnittene Blumen in einer Vase
5018 | tasty (adjective): pleasing to the sense of taste | loc: lecker
  EN TS: That meal looks so tasty!
  de TS: Das Essen sieht so lecker aus!
  EN FS: That soup looks so tasty!
  de FS: Die Suppe sieht so lecker aus!
  EN TP: a tasty bowl of rice
  de TP: eine leckere Schüssel Reis
  EN FP: a tasty slice of cake
  de FP: ein leckeres Stück Kuchen
5019 | beef (noun): meat from an adult cow | loc: Rindfleisch
  EN TS: She is grilling beef.
  de TS: Sie grillt Rindfleisch.
  EN FS: She is grilling fish.
  de FS: Sie grillt Fisch.
  EN TP: slices of grilled beef
  de TP: Scheiben von gegrilltem Rindfleisch
  EN FP: a beef burger with fries
  de FP: ein Rindfleischburger mit Pommes
5020 | replace (verb): to put a new thing in place of a broken one | loc: ersetzen
  EN TS: Two people to replace one bulb!
  de TS: Zwei Leute, um eine Glühbirne zu ersetzen!
  EN FS: Five people to replace one bulb!
  de FS: Fünf Leute, um eine Glühbirne zu ersetzen!
  EN TP: replacing a dead bulb
  de TP: eine kaputte Glühbirne ersetzen
  EN FP: replacing a flat tyre
  de FP: einen platten Reifen ersetzen
5021 | lady (noun): a polite name for any woman | loc: Dame
  EN TS: Such an elegant lady pouring tea.
  de TS: So eine elegante Dame, die Tee einschenkt.
  EN FS: Such an elegant lady pouring wine.
  de FS: So eine elegante Dame, die Wein einschenkt.
  EN TP: a lady in a bonnet
  de TP: eine Dame mit Haube
  EN FP: a lady on a horse
  de FP: eine Dame auf einem Pferd
5022 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: scheinen | checker: word_missing? | translator note: scheinen is for the sun; a chandelier strahlt
  EN TS: The chandelier is shining!
  de TS: Der Kronleuchter strahlt!
  EN FS: The mirror is shining!
  de FS: Der Spiegel strahlt!
  EN TP: a shining chandelier
  de TP: ein strahlender Kronleuchter
  EN FP: shining shoes
  de FP: glänzende Schuhe
5023 | airplane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings, powered by jets | loc: Flugzeug
  EN TS: He is cheering at an airplane!
  de TS: Er jubelt einem Flugzeug zu!
  EN FS: He is cheering at a train!
  de FS: Er jubelt einem Zug zu!
  EN TP: an airplane landing low
  de TP: ein tief landendes Flugzeug
  EN FP: an airplane taking off
  de FP: ein startendes Flugzeug
5024 | dictionary (noun): a book that lists words and what they mean | loc: Wörterbuch
  EN TS: She has all the dictionaries!
  de TS: Sie hat alle Wörterbücher!
  EN FS: She has all the cookbooks!
  de FS: Sie hat alle Kochbücher!
  EN TP: a stack of dictionaries
  de TP: ein Stapel Wörterbücher
  EN FP: a dictionary app
  de FP: eine Wörterbuch-App
5025 | joke (noun): a funny remark that causes laughter | loc: Witz
  EN TS: OMG, this joke is too funny!
  de TS: OMG, dieser Witz ist zu lustig!
  EN FS: OMG, this lesson is too funny!
  de FS: OMG, diese Unterrichtsstunde ist zu lustig!
  EN TP: a joke on a phone
  de TP: ein Witz auf dem Handy
  EN FP: a joke from the teacher
  de FP: ein Witz vom Lehrer
5026 | hilarious (adjective): very funny, causing wild laughter | loc: urkomisch
  EN TS: His phone is hilarious today.
  de TS: Sein Handy ist heute urkomisch.
  EN FS: His book is hilarious today.
  de FS: Sein Buch ist heute urkomisch.
  EN TP: hilarious in a lecture
  de TP: urkomisch in der Vorlesung
  EN FP: hilarious at a wedding
  de FP: urkomisch auf einer Hochzeit
5027 | judge (noun): an official who settles questions in court | loc: Richter
  EN TS: The judge is using her gavel.
  de TS: Die Richterin benutzt ihren Hammer.
  EN FS: The judge is using her phone.
  de FS: Die Richterin benutzt ihr Handy.
  EN TP: a judge with a gavel
  de TP: eine Richterin mit Hammer
  EN FP: a judge in a wig
  de FP: eine Richterin mit Perücke
5028 | difficult (adjective): not easy, needing a lot of effort to do | loc: schwierig
  EN TS: Difficult case? Just a few books.
  de TS: Schwieriger Fall? Nur ein paar Bücher.
  EN FS: Difficult case? Just a few pens.
  de FS: Schwieriger Fall? Nur ein paar Stifte.
  EN TP: a difficult court case
  de TP: ein schwieriger Gerichtsfall
  EN FP: a difficult exam
  de FP: eine schwierige Prüfung
5029 | gesture (noun): a motion of the hands or body to show a feeling | loc: Geste
  EN TS: His gesture says: I won!
  de TS: Seine Geste sagt: Ich hab gewonnen!
  EN FS: Her gesture says: I won!
  de FS: Ihre Geste sagt: Ich hab gewonnen!
  EN TP: a winning fist gesture
  de TP: eine Siegesgeste mit der Faust
  EN FP: a rude hand gesture
  de FP: eine unhöfliche Handgeste
5030 | costume (noun): special clothes worn for a show or festival | loc: Kostüm
  EN TS: Her costume has every colour!
  de TS: Ihr Kostüm hat jede Farbe!
  EN FS: Her hat has every colour!
  de FS: Ihr Hut hat jede Farbe!
  EN TP: a rainbow feather costume
  de TP: ein Regenbogenkostüm aus Federn
  EN FP: a costume for Halloween
  de FP: ein Kostüm für Halloween
5031 | leader (noun): a person who guides others | loc: Anführer
  EN TS: The leader is pointing ahead.
  de TS: Der Anführer zeigt nach vorn.
  EN FS: The leader is sitting down.
  de FS: Der Anführer setzt sich hin.
  EN TP: a leader on a mountain
  de TP: ein Anführer auf einem Berg
  EN FP: a leader on a beach
  de FP: ein Anführer am Strand
5032 | ahead (adverb): in front of the others | loc: voraus
  EN TS: She is leading the team ahead.
  de TS: Sie führt das Team voraus.
  EN FS: She is leading the team back.
  de FS: Sie führt das Team zurück.
  EN TP: walking ahead of the group
  de TP: der Gruppe vorausgehen
  EN FP: planning ahead for the trip
  de FP: für die Reise vorausplanen
5033 | drum (noun): a musical instrument you hit to make a beat | loc: Trommel
  EN TS: The neighbours can hear these drums.
  de TS: Die Nachbarn hören diese Trommeln bestimmt.
  EN FS: The neighbours can hear these horns.
  de FS: Die Nachbarn hören diese Hörner bestimmt.
  EN TP: beating the drums
  de TP: die Trommeln schlagen
  EN FP: a drum solo
  de FP: ein Trommelsolo
5034 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: verschütten
  EN TS: Everything spills in her home!
  de TS: Bei ihr zu Hause wird alles verschüttet!
  EN FS: Everything burns in her home!
  de FS: Bei ihr zu Hause brennt alles an!
  EN TP: milk spilling on the table
  de TP: auf dem Tisch verschüttete Milch
  EN FP: spilling coffee on a laptop
  de FP: Kaffee über den Laptop verschütten
5035 | talent (noun): natural abilities or qualities you have | loc: Talent
  EN TS: That juggler has talent!
  de TS: Der Jongleur hat Talent!
  EN FS: That singer has talent!
  de FS: Der Sänger hat Talent!
  EN TP: a talent for juggling
  de TP: ein Talent fürs Jonglieren
  EN FP: a talent show
  de FP: eine Talentshow
5036 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: lernen
  EN TS: She teaches, he learns. Slowly.
  de TS: Sie unterrichtet, er lernt. Langsam.
  EN FS: He teaches, she learns. Slowly.
  de FS: Er unterrichtet, sie lernt. Langsam.
  EN TP: learning to juggle
  de TP: jonglieren lernen
  EN FP: learning to dance
  de FP: tanzen lernen
5037 | sidewalk (noun): the paved path beside a road where people walk | loc: Bürgersteig
  EN TS: She is on a Paris sidewalk.
  de TS: Sie ist auf einem Pariser Bürgersteig.
  EN FS: She is on a Paris bridge.
  de FS: Sie ist auf einer Pariser Brücke.
  EN TP: a wide paved sidewalk
  de TP: ein breiter gepflasterter Bürgersteig
  EN FP: a sidewalk cafe table
  de FP: ein Cafétisch auf dem Bürgersteig
5038 | pace (noun): how fast you are walking or running | loc: Tempo
  EN TS: A steady pace up the Great Wall.
  de TS: Gleichmäßiges Tempo die Chinesische Mauer hinauf.
  EN FS: A steady pace down the Great Wall.
  de FS: Gleichmäßiges Tempo die Chinesische Mauer hinunter.
  EN TP: a steady running pace
  de TP: ein gleichmäßiges Lauftempo
  EN FP: a slow walking pace
  de FP: ein langsames Gehtempo
5039 | cage (noun): a box of metal bars that shuts an animal in | loc: Käfig
  EN TS: He is opening the cages.
  de TS: Er öffnet die Käfige.
  EN FS: He is closing the cages.
  de FS: Er schließt die Käfige.
  EN TP: opening the bird cages
  de TP: die Vogelkäfige öffnen
  EN FP: cleaning the bird cages
  de FP: die Vogelkäfige putzen
5040 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: Sessel
  EN TS: An armchair? On a bike? Sure.
  de TS: Ein Sessel? Auf dem Fahrrad? Klar.
  EN FS: A sofa? On a bike? Sure.
  de FS: Ein Sofa? Auf dem Fahrrad? Klar.
  EN TP: a yellow velvet armchair
  de TP: ein gelber Samtsessel
  EN FP: an armchair in a car
  de FP: ein Sessel im Auto
5041 | flash (noun): a sudden burst of bright light | loc: Lichtblitz
  EN TS: A white flash lights the roof.
  de TS: Ein weißer Lichtblitz erhellt das Dach.
  EN FS: A green flash lights the roof.
  de FS: Ein grüner Lichtblitz erhellt das Dach.
  EN TP: a blinding white flash
  de TP: ein blendend weißer Lichtblitz
  EN FP: a camera flash indoors
  de FP: ein Kamerablitz drinnen
5042 | painful (adjective): causing pain in your body or mind | loc: schmerzhaft
  EN TS: Leg day was painful!
  de TS: Der Beintag war schmerzhaft!
  EN FS: Arm day was painful!
  de FS: Der Armtag war schmerzhaft!
  EN TP: painful stiff legs
  de TP: schmerzhafte steife Beine
  EN FP: a painful sunburn
  de FP: ein schmerzhafter Sonnenbrand
5043 | silent (adjective): with no sound at all | loc: still
  EN TS: The lion is not silent.
  de TS: Der Löwe ist nicht still.
  EN FS: The lion is not alone.
  de FS: Der Löwe ist nicht allein.
  EN TP: not a silent lion
  de TP: kein stiller Löwe
  EN FP: a silent lion
  de FP: ein stiller Löwe
5044 | hear (verb): to notice a sound with your ears | loc: hören
  EN TS: He can hear through the door.
  de TS: Er kann durch die Tür hören.
  EN FS: He can hear through the wall.
  de FS: Er kann durch die Wand hören.
  EN TP: hearing through a door
  de TP: durch eine Tür hören
  EN FP: hearing a doorbell ring
  de FP: eine Türklingel hören
5045 | sound (noun): the effect you hear from something | loc: Geräusch
  EN TS: The speakers make a big sound!
  de TS: Die Boxen machen ein riesiges Geräusch!
  EN FS: The drums make a big sound!
  de FS: Die Trommeln machen ein riesiges Geräusch!
  EN TP: sound from a boombox
  de TP: Geräusch aus einem Ghettoblaster
  EN FP: sound from a car radio
  de FP: Geräusch aus einem Autoradio
5046 | television (noun): broadcasting moving pictures to a screen | loc: Fernsehen
  EN TS: The television made him jump!
  de TS: Das Fernsehen hat ihn voll erschreckt!
  EN FS: The television made him cry!
  de FS: Das Fernsehen hat ihn zum Weinen gebracht!
  EN TP: watching television
  de TP: Fernsehen schauen
  EN FP: fixing the television
  de FP: den Fernseher reparieren
5047 | living room (noun): the room in a home where people sit and relax | loc: Wohnzimmer
  EN TS: Nobody is leaving the living room tonight.
  de TS: Heute Abend verlässt niemand das Wohnzimmer.
  EN FS: Nobody is leaving the kitchen tonight.
  de FS: Heute Abend verlässt niemand die Küche.
  EN TP: a cosy living room
  de TP: ein gemütliches Wohnzimmer
  EN FP: cleaning the living room
  de FP: das Wohnzimmer aufräumen
5048 | shut (adjective): closed, not open | loc: geschlossen
  EN TS: Big padlock, doors still shut.
  de TS: Großes Vorhängeschloss, Türen immer noch geschlossen.
  EN FS: Big padlock, doors wide open.
  de FS: Großes Vorhängeschloss, Türen weit offen.
  EN TP: doors firmly shut
  de TP: fest geschlossene Türen
  EN FP: eyes shut tight
  de FP: fest geschlossene Augen
5049 | close (verb): to move something so an opening is blocked | loc: schließen
  EN TS: He is closing the front door.
  de TS: Er schließt die Haustür.
  EN FS: He is closing the garage door.
  de FS: Er schließt die Garagentür.
  EN TP: closing a front door
  de TP: eine Haustür schließen
  EN FP: closing a shop
  de FP: einen Laden schließen
5050 | lose (verb): to fail to win | loc: verlieren | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He lost, and the guests left.
  de TS: Er hat verloren, und die Gäste sind gegangen.
  EN FS: He won, and the guests left.
  de FS: Er hat gewonnen, und die Gäste sind gegangen.
  EN TP: losing an election
  de TP: eine Wahl verlieren
  EN FP: losing his car keys
  de FP: seine Autoschlüssel verlieren
5051 | lose (verb): to put something where you cannot find it | loc: verlieren | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She lost it. Passport, maybe?
  de TS: Sie hat was verloren. Den Pass vielleicht?
  EN FS: She found it. Passport, maybe?
  de FS: Sie hat was gefunden. Den Pass vielleicht?
  EN TP: losing something important
  de TP: etwas Wichtiges verlieren
  EN FP: losing a football match
  de FP: ein Fußballspiel verlieren
5052 | light (adjective): having little physical weight, not heavy | loc: leicht
  EN TS: The bags are not light.
  de TS: Die Taschen sind nicht leicht.
  EN FS: The chairs are not light.
  de FS: Die Stühle sind nicht leicht.
  EN TP: suitcases that are not light
  de TP: Koffer, die nicht leicht sind
  EN FP: light hand luggage
  de FP: leichtes Handgepäck
5053 | label (noun): a short description that identifies something | loc: Etikett
  EN TS: The label displays her photo.
  de TS: Das Etikett zeigt ihr Foto.
  EN FS: The label displays her dog.
  de FS: Das Etikett zeigt ihren Hund.
  EN TP: a label with her photo
  de TP: ein Etikett mit ihrem Foto
  EN FP: a label on a jar
  de FP: ein Etikett auf einem Glas
5054 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: heben
  EN TS: Bro is lifting half the house.
  de TS: Der Bro hebt das halbe Haus.
  EN FS: Bro is lifting half the tent.
  de FS: Der Bro hebt das halbe Zelt.
  EN TP: lifting cases into a van
  de TP: Koffer in einen Transporter heben
  EN FP: lifting weights in a gym
  de FP: Gewichte im Gym heben
5055 | organ (noun): a body part in an animal with its own function | loc: Organ
  EN TS: Two pink organs: the lungs.
  de TS: Zwei rosa Organe: die Lunge.
  EN FS: Two pink organs: the kidneys.
  de FS: Zwei rosa Organe: die Nieren.
  EN TP: a pair of breathing organs
  de TP: ein Paar Atmungsorgane
  EN FP: a church organ playing
  de FP: eine spielende Kirchenorgel
5056 | maid (noun): a woman whose job is cleaning hotel rooms | loc: Zimmermädchen
  EN TS: The maid made a towel swan.
  de TS: Das Zimmermädchen hat einen Handtuch-Schwan gemacht.
  EN FS: The maid made a towel dog.
  de FS: Das Zimmermädchen hat einen Handtuch-Hund gemacht.
  EN TP: a maid folding towels
  de TP: ein Zimmermädchen faltet Handtücher
  EN FP: a maid in a castle
  de FP: ein Zimmermädchen in einem Schloss
5057 | mail (noun): letters and packages sent by post | loc: Post
  EN TS: Her mail is flying everywhere!
  de TS: Ihre Post fliegt überall herum!
  EN FS: Her cash is flying everywhere!
  de FS: Ihr Bargeld fliegt überall herum!
  EN TP: mail from the mailbox
  de TP: Post aus dem Briefkasten
  EN FP: mail on a computer
  de FP: Post am Computer
5058 | postman (noun): a person whose job is to bring letters to houses | loc: Briefträger
  EN TS: The boy loves the postman now.
  de TS: Der Junge liebt jetzt den Briefträger.
  EN FS: The boy loves the teacher now.
  de FS: Der Junge liebt jetzt den Lehrer.
  EN TP: a postman with letters
  de TP: ein Briefträger mit Briefen
  EN FP: a postman with a dog
  de FP: ein Briefträger mit Hund
5059 | letter (noun): a written message you send to a person | loc: Brief
  EN TS: He got a lot of letters!
  de TS: Er hat mega viele Briefe bekommen!
  EN FS: He got a lot of flowers!
  de FS: Er hat mega viele Blumen bekommen!
  EN TP: a stack of letters
  de TP: ein Stapel Briefe
  EN FP: a letter from school
  de FP: ein Brief von der Schule
5060 | male (noun): a person of the sex that cannot have babies | loc: Mann | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Only males are in this video.
  de TS: In diesem Video sind nur Männer.
  EN FS: Only girls are in this video.
  de FS: In diesem Video sind nur Mädchen.
  EN TP: males of every age
  de TP: Männer jeden Alters
  EN FP: males in a football team
  de FP: Männer in einer Fußballmannschaft
5061 | aquarium (noun): a glass tank of water where fish are kept | loc: Aquarium
  EN TS: Oh wow, what an aquarium!
  de TS: Oh wow, was für ein Aquarium!
  EN FS: Oh wow, what a volcano!
  de FS: Oh wow, was für ein Vulkan!
  EN TP: a huge aquarium
  de TP: ein riesiges Aquarium
  EN FP: a huge swimming pool
  de FP: ein riesiges Schwimmbecken
5062 | boss (noun): a person who is in control of workers | loc: Chef
  EN TS: The boss is drawing a graph.
  de TS: Der Chef zeichnet ein Diagramm.
  EN FS: The boss is drawing a cat.
  de FS: Der Chef zeichnet eine Katze.
  EN TP: a boss giving instructions
  de TP: ein Chef gibt Anweisungen
  EN FP: a boss taking a break
  de FP: ein Chef macht Pause
5063 | column (noun): a line of people following one after another | loc: die Kolonne
  EN TS: The column is moving in order.
  de TS: Die Kolonne bewegt sich geordnet.
  EN FS: The crowd is moving in order.
  de FS: Die Menge bewegt sich geordnet.
  EN TP: a column of marching ranks
  de TP: eine Kolonne in Marschreihen
  EN FP: a column in a newspaper
  de FP: eine Kolumne in der Zeitung
5064 | trumpet (noun): a brass instrument you blow into | loc: die Trompete
  EN TS: A hundred trumpets. My poor ears!
  de TS: Hundert Trompeten. Meine armen Ohren!
  EN FS: A hundred violins. My poor ears!
  de FS: Hundert Geigen. Meine armen Ohren!
  EN TP: marching with trumpets
  de TP: mit Trompeten marschieren
  EN FP: a jazz club trumpet
  de FP: eine Trompete im Jazzclub
5065 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: Gang
  EN TS: A long aisle of spices.
  de TS: Ein langer Gang voller Gewürze.
  EN FS: A long aisle of shoes.
  de FS: Ein langer Gang voller Schuhe.
  EN TP: an aisle of spice stalls
  de TP: ein Gang mit Gewürzständen
  EN FP: the aisle of a plane
  de FP: der Gang im Flugzeug
5066 | sample (noun): a small part that shows what the whole is like | loc: Probe
  EN TS: Just one olive, as a sample.
  de TS: Nur eine Olive, als Probe.
  EN FS: Just one date, as a sample.
  de FS: Nur eine Dattel, als Probe.
  EN TP: an olive as a sample
  de TP: eine Olive als Probe
  EN FP: a sample of spices
  de FP: eine Probe Gewürze
5067 | marriage (noun): the state of being a married couple | loc: Ehe
  EN TS: Marriage starts with a kiss!
  de TS: Die Ehe beginnt mit einem Kuss!
  EN FS: Marriage starts with a fight!
  de FS: Die Ehe beginnt mit einem Streit!
  EN TP: a marriage with confetti
  de TP: eine Ehe mit Konfetti
  EN FP: a marriage in a church
  de FP: eine Ehe in der Kirche
5068 | bride (noun): the woman getting married that day | loc: Braut
  EN TS: The bride is giving a ring.
  de TS: Die Braut überreicht einen Ring.
  EN FS: The bride is giving a speech.
  de FS: Die Braut hält eine Rede.
  EN TP: a bride on the beach
  de TP: eine Braut am Strand
  EN FP: a bride in a church
  de FP: eine Braut in der Kirche
5069 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: genießen
  EN TS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the massage.
  de TS: Oh wow! Er genießt die Massage.
  EN FS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the coffee.
  de FS: Oh wow! Er genießt den Kaffee.
  EN TP: to enjoy a neck massage
  de TP: eine Nackenmassage genießen
  EN FP: to enjoy a foot massage
  de FP: eine Fußmassage genießen
5070 | mattress (noun): the thick soft part of a bed you lie on | loc: Matratze
  EN TS: She's testing every mattress.
  de TS: Sie testet jede Matratze.
  EN FS: She's testing every pillow.
  de FS: Sie testet jedes Kissen.
  EN TP: lying back on a mattress
  de TP: auf einer Matratze liegen
  EN FP: carrying a mattress
  de FP: eine Matratze tragen
5071 | service (verb): to make a machine fit to use again | loc: warten
  EN TS: He is servicing the vehicle.
  de TS: Er wartet das Fahrzeug.
  EN FS: He is servicing the bicycle.
  de FS: Er wartet das Fahrrad.
  EN TP: servicing a silver car
  de TP: ein silbernes Auto warten
  EN FP: servicing a washing machine
  de FP: eine Waschmaschine warten
5072 | liquid (noun): a substance that is liquid, not solid or gas | loc: Flüssigkeit
  EN TS: The brown liquid is very viscous.
  de TS: Die braune Flüssigkeit ist sehr zähflüssig.
  EN FS: The green liquid is very viscous.
  de FS: Die grüne Flüssigkeit ist sehr zähflüssig.
  EN TP: pouring a brown liquid
  de TP: eine braune Flüssigkeit gießen
  EN FP: pouring a clear liquid
  de FP: eine klare Flüssigkeit gießen
5073 | medicine (noun): something you take that treats an illness | loc: Medizin
  EN TS: This medicine tastes awful!
  de TS: Diese Medizin schmeckt furchtbar!
  EN FS: This medicine tastes great!
  de FS: Diese Medizin schmeckt super!
  EN TP: a spoon of brown medicine
  de TP: ein Löffel braune Medizin
  EN FP: a medicine for a dog
  de FP: Medizin für einen Hund
5074 | introduce (verb): to make people come to know each other | loc: vorstellen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone is introducing themselves to her.
  de TS: Alle stellen sich ihr vor.
  EN FS: Everyone is introducing themselves to him.
  de FS: Alle stellen sich ihm vor.
  EN TP: introducing a new colleague
  de TP: eine neue Kollegin vorstellen
  EN FP: introducing a new product
  de FP: ein neues Produkt vorstellen
5075 | sticky (adjective): having sticky properties, like glue | loc: klebrig
  EN TS: Sticky hands, empty cone. "Great."
  de TS: Klebrige Hände, leere Waffel. „Super.“
  EN FS: Sticky hands, full cone. "Great."
  de FS: Klebrige Hände, volle Waffel. „Super.“
  EN TP: sticky hands from ice cream
  de TP: klebrige Hände vom Eis
  EN FP: sticky tape on a box
  de FP: Klebeband auf einem Karton
5076 | member (noun): one of the persons who joined a group | loc: Mitglied
  EN TS: She is a new club member.
  de TS: Sie ist ein neues Clubmitglied.
  EN FS: She is a new band member.
  de FS: Sie ist ein neues Bandmitglied.
  EN TP: a new club member
  de TP: ein neues Clubmitglied
  EN FP: a member of a band
  de FP: ein Mitglied einer Band
5077 | recall (verb): to bring knowledge back from your memory | loc: sich erinnern
  EN TS: He recalled every card, easy.
  de TS: Er hat sich an jede Karte erinnert, easy.
  EN FS: She recalled every card, easy.
  de FS: Sie hat sich an jede Karte erinnert, easy.
  EN TP: recalling answers on cards
  de TP: sich an Antworten auf Karten erinnern
  EN FP: recalling a broken car
  de FP: ein kaputtes Auto zurückrufen
5078 | pork (noun): meat that comes from a pig | loc: Schweinefleisch
  EN TS: He is making pork tacos.
  de TS: Er macht Tacos mit Schweinefleisch.
  EN FS: He is making fish tacos.
  de FS: Er macht Tacos mit Fisch.
  EN TP: slicing roasted pork
  de TP: geröstetes Schweinefleisch schneiden
  EN FP: pork chops in a pan
  de FP: Schweinekoteletts in der Pfanne
5079 | pyramid (noun): a huge ancient building with triangle sides | loc: Pyramide
  EN TS: Taco first, pyramid second.
  de TS: Erst der Taco, dann die Pyramide.
  EN FS: Taco first, beach second.
  de FS: Erst der Taco, dann der Strand.
  EN TP: a pyramid in the jungle
  de TP: eine Pyramide im Dschungel
  EN FP: a pyramid in the desert
  de FP: eine Pyramide in der Wüste
5080 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: gelb
  EN TS: The yellow dress looks great.
  de TS: Das gelbe Kleid sieht toll aus.
  EN FS: The yellow coat looks great.
  de FS: Der gelbe Mantel sieht toll aus.
  EN TP: a bright yellow sundress
  de TP: ein knallgelbes Sommerkleid
  EN FP: a bright yellow raincoat
  de FP: ein knallgelber Regenmantel
5081 | purple (adjective): the color between red and blue | loc: lila
  EN TS: Purple is her colour.
  de TS: Lila ist ihre Farbe.
  EN FS: Green is her colour.
  de FS: Grün ist ihre Farbe.
  EN TP: a fitted purple dress
  de TP: ein enges lila Kleid
  EN FP: a purple silk scarf
  de FP: ein lila Seidenschal
5082 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: Frisur
  EN TS: Two buns? Great hairstyle.
  de TS: Zwei Dutts? Tolle Frisur.
  EN FS: Two braids? Great hairstyle.
  de FS: Zwei Zöpfe? Tolle Frisur.
  EN TP: a hairstyle with two buns
  de TP: eine Frisur mit zwei Dutts
  EN FP: a hairstyle with a fringe
  de FP: eine Frisur mit Pony
5083 | berry (noun): small soft fruits that you can eat | loc: Beere
  EN TS: They are adding berries.
  de TS: Sie geben Beeren dazu.
  EN FS: They are adding nuts.
  de FS: Sie geben Nüsse dazu.
  EN TP: red berries in the batter
  de TP: rote Beeren im Teig
  EN FP: picking berries in a forest
  de FP: Beeren im Wald pflücken
5084 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: grün
  EN TS: The green gown is stunning!
  de TS: Das grüne Ballkleid ist atemberaubend!
  EN FS: The red gown is stunning!
  de FS: Das rote Ballkleid ist atemberaubend!
  EN TP: a long green gown
  de TP: ein langes grünes Kleid
  EN FP: a green evening bag
  de FP: eine grüne Abendtasche
5085 | statue (noun): a figure of a person or creature made of stone | loc: Statue
  EN TS: She is posing like the statue!
  de TS: Sie posiert wie die Statue!
  EN FS: She is posing like the guard!
  de FS: Sie posiert wie die Wache!
  EN TP: a selfie with a statue
  de TP: ein Selfie mit einer Statue
  EN FP: a selfie with a horse
  de FP: ein Selfie mit einem Pferd
5086 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: glänzend
  EN TS: The floor is so shiny!
  de TS: Was für ein glänzender Boden!
  EN FS: The floor is so dusty!
  de FS: Was für ein staubiger Boden!
  EN TP: a shiny stone floor
  de TP: ein glänzender Steinboden
  EN FP: a shiny new phone
  de FP: ein glänzendes neues Handy
5087 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: schmutzig
  EN TS: Paws made the floor dirty.
  de TS: Pfoten haben den Boden schmutzig gemacht.
  EN FS: Paws made the wall dirty.
  de FS: Pfoten haben die Wand schmutzig gemacht.
  EN TP: a dirty tiled floor
  de TP: ein schmutziger Fliesenboden
  EN FP: dirty dishes in a sink
  de FP: schmutziges Geschirr in der Spüle
5088 | awake (adjective): not in a state of sleep | loc: wach
  EN TS: The boy is awake and yawning.
  de TS: Der Junge ist wach und gähnt.
  EN FS: The boy is awake and eating.
  de FS: Der Junge ist wach und isst.
  EN TP: awake at sunrise
  de TP: wach bei Sonnenaufgang
  EN FP: awake at midnight
  de FP: wach um Mitternacht
5089 | mother (noun): a woman who has given birth to a child | loc: Mutter
  EN TS: This mother does it all.
  de TS: Diese Mutter macht einfach alles.
  EN FS: This father does it all.
  de FS: Dieser Vater macht einfach alles.
  EN TP: a mother flipping pancakes
  de TP: eine Mutter wendet Pfannkuchen
  EN FP: a mother buying pancakes
  de FP: eine Mutter kauft Pfannkuchen
5090 | nursery (noun): a room in a home for a baby | loc: Kinderzimmer
  EN TS: A cosy nursery full of toys.
  de TS: Ein gemütliches Kinderzimmer voller Spielzeug.
  EN FS: A cosy kitchen full of toys.
  de FS: Eine gemütliche Küche voller Spielzeug.
  EN TP: a nursery with a cot
  de TP: ein Kinderzimmer mit Babybett
  EN FP: a plant nursery
  de FP: eine Gärtnerei
5091 | motorbike (noun): a two-wheeled motor vehicle you ride | loc: Motorrad
  EN TS: The small motorbike is green.
  de TS: Das kleine Motorrad ist grün.
  EN FS: The small motorbike is red.
  de FS: Das kleine Motorrad ist rot.
  EN TP: a green motorbike in town
  de TP: ein grünes Motorrad in der Stadt
  EN FP: a green motorbike for sale
  de FP: ein grünes Motorrad zu verkaufen
5092 | helper (noun): a person who helps someone | loc: Helfer
  EN TS: Our helper moves boxes like a pro.
  de TS: Unser Helfer schleppt Kisten wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: Our helper moves plants like a pro.
  de FS: Unser Helfer schleppt Pflanzen wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: a helper with a box
  de TP: ein Helfer mit einer Kiste
  EN FP: a helper with a lamp
  de FP: ein Helfer mit einer Lampe
5093 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: überwuchert
  EN TS: The lawn was a bit overgrown.
  de TS: Der Rasen war ein bisschen überwuchert.
  EN FS: The pool was a bit overgrown.
  de FS: Der Pool war ein bisschen überwuchert.
  EN TP: mowing overgrown grass
  de TP: überwuchertes Gras mähen
  EN FP: an overgrown hedge
  de FP: eine überwucherte Hecke
5094 | skinny (adjective): being very thin | loc: dünn
  EN TS: He is flexing his skinny arm.
  de TS: Er spannt seinen dünnen Arm an.
  EN FS: He is flexing his skinny leg.
  de FS: Er spannt sein dünnes Bein an.
  EN TP: flexing a skinny arm
  de TP: einen dünnen Arm anspannen
  EN FP: wearing skinny jeans
  de FP: eine Skinny Jeans tragen
5095 | awe (noun): a huge feeling of wonder at something | loc: Ehrfurcht
  EN TS: He is staring up in awe!
  de TS: Er schaut voller Ehrfurcht nach oben!
  EN FS: He is staring down in awe!
  de FS: Er schaut voller Ehrfurcht nach unten!
  EN TP: awe at a giant skeleton
  de TP: Ehrfurcht vor einem Riesenskelett
  EN FP: awe at a tiny coin
  de FP: Ehrfurcht vor einer winzigen Münze
5096 | ground (noun): the solid surface of the earth you stand on | loc: Boden
  EN TS: Mushrooms grow in the ground.
  de TS: Pilze wachsen im Boden.
  EN FS: Mushrooms grow in the water.
  de FS: Pilze wachsen im Wasser.
  EN TP: a mushroom on the ground
  de TP: ein Pilz auf dem Boden
  EN FP: a mushroom on a pizza
  de FP: ein Pilz auf einer Pizza
5097 | music (noun): an art form of instrumental or vocal tones | loc: Musik
  EN TS: His music stopped the street.
  de TS: Seine Musik bringt die Straße zum Stehen.
  EN FS: His music emptied the street.
  de FS: Seine Musik leert die Straße.
  EN TP: street music
  de TP: Straßenmusik
  EN FP: a music shop
  de FP: ein Musikgeschäft
5098 | national (adjective): belonging to one nation or country | loc: national | translator note: national appears in the compound Nationalmannschaft in TS
  EN TS: He loves his national team.
  de TS: Er liebt seine Nationalmannschaft.
  EN FS: She loves her national team.
  de FS: Sie liebt ihre Nationalmannschaft.
  EN TP: national colours on a face
  de TP: nationale Farben im Gesicht
  EN FP: a national holiday
  de FP: ein nationaler Feiertag
5099 | photo (noun): a print of a person or scene | loc: Foto
  EN TS: Everyone is adding a photo!
  de TS: Alle fügen ein Foto hinzu!
  EN FS: Everyone is adding a stamp!
  de FS: Alle fügen eine Briefmarke hinzu!
  EN TP: photos on a world map
  de TP: Fotos auf einer Weltkarte
  EN FP: a photo album
  de FP: ein Fotoalbum
5100 | stick (verb): to put or fix something in place | loc: befestigen
  EN TS: They are sticking photos on a map.
  de TS: Sie befestigen Fotos auf einer Karte.
  EN FS: They are sticking photos on a door.
  de FS: Sie befestigen Fotos an einer Tür.
  EN TP: sticking photos on a map
  de TP: Fotos auf einer Karte befestigen
  EN FP: sticking maps on the wall
  de FP: Karten an der Wand befestigen
5101 | nausea (noun): the sick feeling that you may vomit | loc: Übelkeit
  EN TS: Nausea is winning this trip.
  de TS: Die Übelkeit gewinnt diese Fahrt.
  EN FS: Nausea is winning this flight.
  de FS: Die Übelkeit gewinnt diesen Flug.
  EN TP: nausea on a ferry
  de TP: Übelkeit auf einer Fähre
  EN FP: nausea in a car
  de FP: Übelkeit im Auto
5102 | alley (noun): a very narrow street between buildings | loc: Gasse
  EN TS: This alley is super narrow!
  de TS: Diese Gasse ist mega eng!
  EN FS: This alley is super wide!
  de FS: Diese Gasse ist mega breit!
  EN TP: a narrow medina alley
  de TP: eine enge Gasse in der Medina
  EN FP: an alley full of cats
  de FP: eine Gasse voller Katzen
5103 | neck (noun): the part that connects the head to the body | loc: Hals
  EN TS: A giraffe's neck is over her!
  de TS: Der Hals einer Giraffe ist über ihr!
  EN FS: A horse's neck is over her!
  de FS: Der Hals eines Pferdes ist über ihr!
  EN TP: a giraffe's long neck
  de TP: der lange Hals einer Giraffe
  EN FP: a snake around her neck
  de FP: eine Schlange um ihren Hals
5104 | talk (noun): a conversation where people exchange ideas | loc: Gespräch
  EN TS: Their talk is friendly.
  de TS: Ihr Gespräch ist freundlich.
  EN FS: Their talk is angry.
  de FS: Ihr Gespräch ist wütend.
  EN TP: a talk over the fence
  de TP: ein Gespräch über den Zaun
  EN FP: a talk at a conference
  de FP: ein Gespräch auf einer Konferenz
5105 | ditch (noun): a long narrow channel dug into the earth | loc: Graben
  EN TS: A ditch full of ducks.
  de TS: Ein Graben voller Enten.
  EN FS: A ditch full of boats.
  de FS: Ein Graben voller Boote.
  EN TP: a straight water ditch
  de TP: ein gerader Wassergraben
  EN FP: a ditch by a motorway
  de FP: ein Graben an der Autobahn
5106 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: die Windmühle
  EN TS: Windmill, tulips, stroopwafel: done.
  de TS: Windmühle, Tulpen, Stroopwafel: erledigt.
  EN FS: Windmill, tulips, pizza slice: done.
  de FS: Windmühle, Tulpen, Pizzastück: erledigt.
  EN TP: a turning windmill
  de TP: eine sich drehende Windmühle
  EN FP: a windmill on a beach
  de FP: eine Windmühle am Strand
5107 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: in den Armen wiegen
  EN TS: Both are cradling the baby.
  de TS: Beide wiegen das Baby in den Armen.
  EN FS: Both are washing the baby.
  de FS: Beide waschen das Baby.
  EN TP: to cradle a newborn
  de TP: ein Neugeborenes in den Armen wiegen
  EN FP: to cradle a teacup
  de FP: eine Teetasse in den Händen wiegen
5108 | village (noun): a place where people live, smaller than a town | loc: Dorf
  EN TS: The village is on the water.
  de TS: Das Dorf steht auf dem Wasser.
  EN FS: The village is on the hill.
  de FS: Das Dorf steht auf dem Hügel.
  EN TP: a village on stilts
  de TP: ein Dorf auf Stelzen
  EN FP: a village in the snow
  de FP: ein Dorf im Schnee
5109 | sweet (adjective): having the taste of sugar | loc: süß
  EN TS: A dozen sweet cupcakes, and she is eating alone.
  de TS: Ein Dutzend süße Cupcakes, und sie isst allein.
  EN FS: A dozen sweet cookies, and she is eating alone.
  de FS: Ein Dutzend süße Kekse, und sie isst allein.
  EN TP: a tray of sweet cupcakes
  de TP: ein Tablett süßer Cupcakes
  EN FP: a sweet cup of tea
  de FP: eine süße Tasse Tee
5110 | quiet (adjective): with almost no activity going on | loc: ruhig
  EN TS: The park is very quiet.
  de TS: Der Park ist sehr ruhig.
  EN FS: The beach is very quiet.
  de FS: Der Strand ist sehr ruhig.
  EN TP: a quiet misty park
  de TP: ein ruhiger, nebliger Park
  EN FP: a quiet misty beach
  de FP: ein ruhiger, nebliger Strand
5111 | nurse (verb): to care for someone who is ill | loc: pflegen
  EN TS: She is nursing a sick child.
  de TS: Sie pflegt ein krankes Kind.
  EN FS: She is nursing a sick puppy.
  de FS: Sie pflegt einen kranken Welpen.
  EN TP: nursing a sick child
  de TP: ein krankes Kind pflegen
  EN FP: nursing a glass of water
  de FP: an einem Glas Wasser nippen
5112 | grain (noun): a small particle of a substance | loc: Körnchen
  EN TS: Grains are flying in the air.
  de TS: Körnchen fliegen durch die Luft.
  EN FS: Grains are flying into a cup.
  de FS: Körnchen fliegen in eine Tasse.
  EN TP: falling grains of rice
  de TP: fallende Reiskörnchen
  EN FP: a grain of sand
  de FP: ein Sandkörnchen
5113 | advice (noun): an idea about the best action to take | loc: der Rat
  EN TS: Good advice: eat more fish.
  de TS: Guter Rat: mehr Fisch essen.
  EN FS: Good advice: eat more cake.
  de FS: Guter Rat: mehr Kuchen essen.
  EN TP: advice about healthy food
  de TP: Rat zu gesunder Ernährung
  EN FP: advice about money
  de FP: Rat in Geldfragen
5114 | flamingo (noun): a tall pink water bird with a bent beak | loc: Flamingo
  EN TS: The flamingos are flying away.
  de TS: Die Flamingos fliegen davon.
  EN FS: The swans are flying away.
  de FS: Die Schwäne fliegen davon.
  EN TP: a flock of flamingos
  de TP: ein Schwarm Flamingos
  EN FP: a flamingo in a zoo
  de FP: ein Flamingo im Zoo
5115 | study (verb): to look at something in detail | loc: untersuchen
  EN TS: She is studying an insect.
  de TS: Sie untersucht ein Insekt.
  EN FS: She is studying a flower.
  de FS: Sie untersucht eine Blume.
  EN TP: studying a small insect
  de TP: ein kleines Insekt untersuchen
  EN FP: studying for an exam
  de FP: für eine Prüfung lernen
5116 | to open (verb): to make something become open | loc: öffnen
  EN TS: He is opening all the windows!
  de TS: Er öffnet alle Fenster!
  EN FS: He is closing all the windows!
  de FS: Er schließt alle Fenster!
  EN TP: to open the windows
  de TP: die Fenster öffnen
  EN FP: to open a present
  de FP: ein Geschenk öffnen
5117 | bookstore (noun): a shop where books are sold | loc: Buchhandlung
  EN TS: He loves this bookstore!
  de TS: Er liebt diese Buchhandlung!
  EN FS: He hates this bookstore!
  de FS: Er hasst diese Buchhandlung!
  EN TP: a packed old bookstore
  de TP: eine vollgestopfte alte Buchhandlung
  EN FP: a bookstore closing down
  de FP: eine Buchhandlung macht dicht
5118 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: Sonnenlicht
  EN TS: Sunlight is pouring over him. What a morning!
  de TS: Sonnenlicht strömt über ihn. Was für ein Morgen!
  EN FS: Rain is pouring over him. What a morning!
  de FS: Regen strömt über ihn. Was für ein Morgen!
  EN TP: sunlight through a window
  de TP: Sonnenlicht durchs Fenster
  EN FP: sunlight through the trees
  de FP: Sonnenlicht durch die Bäume
5119 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: Eingang
  EN TS: The entrance has wooden gates.
  de TS: Der Eingang hat Holztore.
  EN FS: The entrance has glass gates.
  de FS: Der Eingang hat Glastore.
  EN TP: the park entrance
  de TP: der Eingang zum Park
  EN FP: the museum entrance
  de FP: der Eingang zum Museum
5120 | surgeon (noun): a doctor who does surgery | loc: Chirurg
  EN TS: All done! The surgeons are happy.
  de TS: Geschafft! Die Chirurgen sind glücklich.
  EN FS: All done! The bakers are happy.
  de FS: Geschafft! Die Bäcker sind glücklich.
  EN TP: surgeons around a patient
  de TP: Chirurgen um einen Patienten
  EN FP: surgeons in a waiting room
  de FP: Chirurgen im Wartezimmer
5121 | remove (verb): to take something off or out by lifting it | loc: herausnehmen
  EN TS: She is removing the muffins.
  de TS: Sie nimmt die Muffins heraus.
  EN FS: She is removing the cookies.
  de FS: Sie nimmt die Kekse heraus.
  EN TP: removing a tray of muffins
  de TP: ein Blech Muffins herausnehmen
  EN FP: removing the oven door
  de FP: die Ofentür herausnehmen
5122 | achieve (verb): to gain something by real effort | loc: erreichen
  EN TS: They all achieved their goals.
  de TS: Sie haben alle ihre Ziele erreicht.
  EN FS: They all missed their goals.
  de FS: Sie haben alle ihre Ziele verfehlt.
  EN TP: achieving a hard goal
  de TP: ein schwieriges Ziel erreichen
  EN FP: achieving good grades
  de FP: gute Noten erreichen
5123 | flood (verb): to fill something too quickly and spill over | loc: überfluten
  EN TS: Coffee, sink and bath are all flooding!
  de TS: Kaffee, Spüle und Badewanne überfluten alles!
  EN FS: Coffee, sink and oven are all flooding!
  de FS: Kaffee, Spüle und Ofen überfluten alles!
  EN TP: a flooding bathtub
  de TP: eine Badewanne überflutet das Bad
  EN FP: a flooded road after rain
  de FP: eine nach Regen überflutete Straße
5124 | marathon (noun): a running race of about 42 kilometres | loc: Marathon
  EN TS: Marathon in the old town.
  de TS: Marathon in der Altstadt.
  EN FS: Marathon in the forest.
  de FS: Marathon im Wald.
  EN TP: running a city marathon
  de TP: einen Stadtmarathon laufen
  EN FP: a movie marathon
  de FP: ein Filmmarathon
5125 | stage (verb): to perform a play on a stage | loc: inszenieren
  EN TS: They are staging a revolution!
  de TS: Sie inszenieren eine Revolution!
  EN FS: They are staging a wedding!
  de FS: Sie inszenieren eine Hochzeit!
  EN TP: staging an old play
  de TP: ein altes Stück inszenieren
  EN FP: staging a protest
  de FP: einen Protest inszenieren
5126 | business (noun): a company and the people who work in it | loc: Unternehmen
  EN TS: He is proud of his business.
  de TS: Er ist stolz auf sein Unternehmen.
  EN FS: He is proud of his car.
  de FS: Er ist stolz auf sein Auto.
  EN TP: a small corner business
  de TP: ein kleines Unternehmen an der Ecke
  EN FP: a big online business
  de FP: ein großes Online-Unternehmen
5127 | shut (verb): to move a lid so an opening is closed | loc: schließen
  EN TS: The suitcase won't shut!
  de TS: Der Koffer lässt sich nicht schließen!
  EN FS: The suitcase won't open!
  de FS: Der Koffer lässt sich nicht öffnen!
  EN TP: to shut a full suitcase
  de TP: einen vollen Koffer schließen
  EN FP: to shut a window
  de FP: ein Fenster schließen
5128 | hurt (noun): damage to the body from an accident | loc: Verletzung
  EN TS: The sofa caused real hurt!
  de TS: Das Sofa hat eine echte Verletzung verursacht!
  EN FS: The table caused real hurt!
  de FS: Der Tisch hat eine echte Verletzung verursacht!
  EN TP: hurt from the sofa corner
  de TP: eine Verletzung an der Sofaecke
  EN FP: hurt from a football game
  de FP: eine Verletzung beim Fußball
5129 | cover (noun): a sheet put over a thing to shelter it | loc: Abdeckung
  EN TS: The furniture is under covers.
  de TS: Die Möbel sind unter Abdeckungen.
  EN FS: The furniture is under towels.
  de FS: Die Möbel sind unter Handtüchern.
  EN TP: grey covers on furniture
  de TP: graue Abdeckungen auf Möbeln
  EN FP: a cover on a book
  de FP: ein Schutzumschlag auf einem Buch
5130 | kite (noun): a cloth wing on strings pulled by the wind | loc: Drachen
  EN TS: His kite is flying so high!
  de TS: Sein Drachen fliegt so hoch!
  EN FS: His drone is flying so high!
  de FS: Seine Drohne fliegt so hoch!
  EN TP: flying a kite
  de TP: einen Drachen steigen lassen
  EN FP: a kite in a tree
  de FP: ein Drachen im Baum
5131 | focus (verb): to direct your attention on something | loc: sich konzentrieren
  EN TS: He is focusing on the ball.
  de TS: Er konzentriert sich auf den Ball.
  EN FS: He is focusing on the boys.
  de FS: Er konzentriert sich auf die Jungs.
  EN TP: focusing on the ball
  de TP: sich auf den Ball konzentrieren
  EN FP: focusing on the crowd
  de FP: sich auf die Menge konzentrieren
5132 | mixture (noun): a substance of two or more things mixed together | loc: Mischung
  EN TS: He is pouring the mixture.
  de TS: Er gießt die Mischung.
  EN FS: He is stirring the mixture.
  de FS: Er rührt die Mischung.
  EN TP: pancake mixture in a pan
  de TP: Pfannkuchen-Mischung in der Pfanne
  EN FP: a mixture of paint colours
  de FP: eine Mischung aus Farben
5133 | scream (verb): to cry out very loudly in fear | loc: schreien
  EN TS: She is screaming in the park.
  de TS: Sie schreit im Park.
  EN FS: She is screaming in the pool.
  de FS: Sie schreit im Pool.
  EN TP: screaming in a freeze game
  de TP: Schreien beim Freeze-Spiel
  EN FP: screaming at a horror film
  de FP: Schreien bei einem Horrorfilm
5134 | parent (noun): a father or mother of a child | loc: Elternteil | translator note: loc Elternteil is singular only; plural parents = Eltern
  EN TS: The parents are a bit busy.
  de TS: Die Eltern sind etwas beschäftigt.
  EN FS: The dogs are a bit busy.
  de FS: Die Hunde sind etwas beschäftigt.
  EN TP: parents feeding a baby
  de TP: Eltern füttern ein Baby
  EN FP: parents feeding the ducks
  de FP: Eltern füttern die Enten
5135 | space (noun): an area kept for one particular purpose | loc: Platz
  EN TS: Tight space, perfect parking.
  de TS: Wenig Platz, perfekt eingeparkt.
  EN FS: Wide space, perfect parking.
  de FS: Viel Platz, perfekt eingeparkt.
  EN TP: a tight parking space
  de TP: ein enger Platz zum Parken
  EN FP: a space rocket launch
  de FP: ein Raketenstart ins All
5136 | debate (noun): a discussion with reasons for and against | loc: Debatte
  EN TS: The debate is getting loud!
  de TS: Die Debatte wird laut!
  EN FS: The debate is getting quiet!
  de FS: Die Debatte wird leise!
  EN TP: a loud debate
  de TP: eine laute Debatte
  EN FP: a debate on TV
  de FP: eine Debatte im Fernsehen
5137 | parliament (noun): the building where politicians make laws | loc: Parlament
  EN TS: The parliament is full today.
  de TS: Das Parlament ist heute voll.
  EN FS: The parliament is empty today.
  de FS: Das Parlament ist heute leer.
  EN TP: a full parliament
  de TP: ein volles Parlament
  EN FP: an empty parliament
  de FP: ein leeres Parlament
5138 | train (noun): railway cars joined together that carry people | loc: Zug
  EN TS: She is on the train now.
  de TS: Sie sitzt jetzt im Zug.
  EN FS: She is on the bus now.
  de FS: Sie sitzt jetzt im Bus.
  EN TP: a seat on the train
  de TP: ein Platz im Zug
  EN FP: a seat on the plane
  de FP: ein Platz im Flugzeug
5139 | blank (adjective): with nothing written or printed on it | loc: leer
  EN TS: The pages were blank at first.
  de TS: Die Seiten waren anfangs leer.
  EN FS: The pages were full at first.
  de FS: Die Seiten waren anfangs voll.
  EN TP: a blank passport page
  de TP: eine leere Passseite
  EN FP: a blank face
  de FP: ein leerer Blick
5140 | allow (verb): to give someone permission to do something | loc: erlauben
  EN TS: The stamp allows her to enter.
  de TS: Der Stempel erlaubt ihr die Einreise.
  EN FS: The stamp allows her to drive.
  de FS: Der Stempel erlaubt ihr das Autofahren.
  EN TP: allowed to enter
  de TP: Einreise erlaubt
  EN FP: allowed to smoke
  de FP: Rauchen erlaubt
5141 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: Arzt
  EN TS: The doctor has a stethoscope.
  de TS: Der Arzt hat ein Stethoskop.
  EN FS: The doctor has a camera.
  de FS: Der Arzt hat eine Kamera.
  EN TP: a doctor with a stethoscope
  de TP: ein Arzt mit Stethoskop
  EN FP: a doctor in an ambulance
  de FP: ein Arzt im Krankenwagen
5142 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: Nachbarschaft
  EN TS: The neighborhood is decorated.
  de TS: Die Nachbarschaft ist geschmückt.
  EN FS: The neighborhood is empty.
  de FS: Die Nachbarschaft ist leer.
  EN TP: a decorated neighborhood
  de TP: eine geschmückte Nachbarschaft
  EN FP: a neighborhood yard sale
  de FP: ein Flohmarkt in der Nachbarschaft
5143 | peace (noun): the state of having no war | loc: Frieden
  EN TS: The soldiers are making peace.
  de TS: Die Soldaten schließen Frieden.
  EN FS: The soldiers are making war.
  de FS: Die Soldaten führen Krieg.
  EN TP: making peace
  de TP: Frieden schließen
  EN FP: peace and quiet at home
  de FP: Ruhe und Frieden zu Hause
5144 | dove (noun): the white bird used as a sign of peace | loc: Taube
  EN TS: The girls are releasing doves!
  de TS: Die Mädchen lassen Tauben fliegen!
  EN FS: The boys are releasing doves!
  de FS: Die Jungs lassen Tauben fliegen!
  EN TP: releasing white doves
  de TP: weiße Tauben freilassen
  EN FP: feeding white doves
  de FP: weiße Tauben füttern
5145 | tram (noun): an electric city train on rails in the street | loc: Straßenbahn
  EN TS: The tram is right behind him.
  de TS: Die Straßenbahn ist direkt hinter ihm.
  EN FS: The bus is right behind him.
  de FS: Der Bus ist direkt hinter ihm.
  EN TP: a tram on the square
  de TP: eine Straßenbahn auf dem Platz
  EN FP: a tram on a bridge
  de FP: eine Straßenbahn auf einer Brücke
5146 | strip (noun): a long narrow piece of something | loc: Streifen
  EN TS: The peel is one long strip!
  de TS: Die Schale ist ein einziger langer Streifen!
  EN FS: The peel is two short strips!
  de FS: Die Schale sind zwei kurze Streifen!
  EN TP: a long strip of peel
  de TP: ein langer Streifen Schale
  EN FP: a strip of tape
  de FP: ein Streifen Klebeband
5147 | people (noun): any group of human beings together | loc: Menschen
  EN TS: So many people are crossing!
  de TS: So viele Menschen überqueren die Straße!
  EN FS: So many cars are crossing!
  de FS: So viele Autos überqueren die Straße!
  EN TP: people filling the crossing
  de TP: Menschen auf dem Zebrastreifen
  EN FP: people waiting for a bus
  de FP: Menschen warten auf den Bus
5148 | morning (noun): the time between dawn and noon | loc: Morgen
  EN TS: Good morning, empty city!
  de TS: Guten Morgen, leere Stadt!
  EN FS: Good night, empty city!
  de FS: Gute Nacht, leere Stadt!
  EN TP: an empty morning street
  de TP: eine leere Straße am Morgen
  EN FP: a busy morning street
  de FP: eine volle Straße am Morgen
5149 | pharmacy (noun): a shop where you buy medicine | loc: Apotheke
  EN TS: What a big old pharmacy!
  de TS: Was für eine große alte Apotheke!
  EN FS: What a big old bakery!
  de FS: Was für eine große alte Bäckerei!
  EN TP: a grand old pharmacy
  de TP: eine prachtvolle alte Apotheke
  EN FP: a pharmacy in a hospital
  de FP: eine Apotheke im Krankenhaus
5150 | prescription (noun): directions a doctor writes down beforehand | loc: Rezept
  EN TS: He is presenting a prescription.
  de TS: Er legt ein Rezept vor.
  EN FS: He is presenting a train ticket.
  de FS: Er legt eine Zugfahrkarte vor.
  EN TP: handing over a prescription
  de TP: ein Rezept überreichen
  EN FP: writing a prescription
  de FP: ein Rezept ausstellen
5151 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: Rahmen
  EN TS: The frame is silver.
  de TS: Der Rahmen ist silbern.
  EN FS: The frame is gold.
  de FS: Der Rahmen ist golden.
  EN TP: a silver picture frame
  de TP: ein silberner Bilderrahmen
  EN FP: a silver window frame
  de FP: ein silberner Fensterrahmen
5152 | bedroom (noun): the room you sleep in | loc: Schlafzimmer
  EN TS: Her bedroom is all pillows!
  de TS: Ihr Schlafzimmer besteht nur aus Kissen!
  EN FS: Her bedroom is all books!
  de FS: Ihr Schlafzimmer besteht nur aus Büchern!
  EN TP: pillows in the bedroom
  de TP: Kissen im Schlafzimmer
  EN FP: pillows in the living room
  de FP: Kissen im Wohnzimmer
5153 | bed (noun): a plot of ground where plants are growing | loc: Beet
  EN TS: The team is planting the bed.
  de TS: Das Team bepflanzt das Beet.
  EN FS: The team is painting the bed.
  de FS: Das Team streicht das Beet.
  EN TP: a raised garden bed
  de TP: ein Hochbeet im Garten
  EN FP: an unmade bed
  de FP: ein ungemachtes Bett
5154 | houseplant (noun): a plant kept indoors in a pot for decoration | loc: Zimmerpflanze
  EN TS: His houseplants are a jungle.
  de TS: Seine Zimmerpflanzen sind ein Dschungel.
  EN FS: His books are a jungle.
  de FS: Seine Bücher sind ein Dschungel.
  EN TP: a room full of houseplants
  de TP: ein Raum voller Zimmerpflanzen
  EN FP: a houseplant for sale
  de FP: eine Zimmerpflanze zu verkaufen
5155 | lunch (noun): a meal eaten in the middle of the day | loc: Mittagessen
  EN TS: Lunch for the whole family!
  de TS: Mittagessen für die ganze Familie!
  EN FS: Lunch for just two people!
  de FS: Mittagessen für nur zwei Leute!
  EN TP: a big family lunch
  de TP: ein großes Mittagessen mit Familie
  EN FP: a quick lunch at work
  de FP: ein schnelles Mittagessen im Büro
5156 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: knien
  EN TS: He scored, so he is kneeling.
  de TS: Er hat getroffen, also kniet er.
  EN FS: He missed, so he is kneeling.
  de FS: Er hat verschossen, also kniet er.
  EN TP: kneeling on the grass
  de TP: auf dem Rasen knien
  EN FP: kneeling to pray
  de FP: zum Beten knien
5157 | neighbourhood (noun): the nearby area around where you live | loc: Umgebung | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc Umgebung means surroundings, not the people; used Nachbarschaft
  EN TS: The whole neighbourhood is playing football!
  de TS: Die ganze Nachbarschaft spielt Fußball!
  EN FS: The whole neighbourhood is playing volleyball!
  de FS: Die ganze Nachbarschaft spielt Volleyball!
  EN TP: a neighbourhood football game
  de TP: ein Fußballspiel in der Nachbarschaft
  EN FP: a neighbourhood bike race
  de FP: ein Radrennen in der Nachbarschaft
5158 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: verbinden
  EN TS: He is connecting the cables.
  de TS: Er verbindet die Kabel.
  EN FS: He is cutting the cables.
  de FS: Er durchtrennt die Kabel.
  EN TP: connecting a gaming setup
  de TP: ein Gaming-Setup verbinden
  EN FP: connecting with friends
  de FP: sich mit Freunden verbinden
5159 | wet (verb): to make something wet | loc: nass machen
  EN TS: The pipe wet him on purpose.
  de TS: Das Rohr hat ihn absichtlich nass gemacht.
  EN FS: The dog wet him on purpose.
  de FS: Der Hund hat ihn absichtlich nass gemacht.
  EN TP: wetting the plumber's face
  de TP: das Gesicht des Klempners nass machen
  EN FP: wetting the kitchen plants
  de FP: die Küchenpflanzen nass machen
5160 | dash (verb): to run or move very quickly | loc: flitzen
  EN TS: He's dashing through the rain.
  de TS: Er flitzt durch den Regen.
  EN FS: He's dashing through the snow.
  de FS: Er flitzt durch den Schnee.
  EN TP: dashing past pigeons
  de TP: an Tauben vorbeiflitzen
  EN FP: dashing past the police
  de FP: an der Polizei vorbeiflitzen
5161 | cathedral (noun): a very large and important church | loc: Kathedrale
  EN TS: He stands before a cathedral.
  de TS: Er steht vor einer Kathedrale.
  EN FS: He stands before a castle.
  de FS: Er steht vor einer Burg.
  EN TP: a brick cathedral tower
  de TP: der Turm einer Backsteinkathedrale
  EN FP: inside a dark cathedral
  de FP: in einer dunklen Kathedrale
5162 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: schön
  EN TS: Beautiful views and dumplings.
  de TS: Schöne Aussicht und Knödel.
  EN FS: Beautiful views and pancakes.
  de FS: Schöne Aussicht und Pfannkuchen.
  EN TP: a beautiful mountain lake
  de TP: ein schöner Bergsee
  EN FP: a beautiful beach
  de FP: ein schöner Strand
5163 | politician (noun): a leader who works in government | loc: Politiker
  EN TS: Politicians, arguing as usual.
  de TS: Politiker streiten, wie immer.
  EN FS: Politicians, hugging as usual.
  de FS: Politiker umarmen sich, wie immer.
  EN TP: angry politicians pointing
  de TP: wütende Politiker zeigen aufeinander
  EN FP: politicians shaking hands
  de FP: Politiker beim Händeschütteln
5164 | campaign (noun): a race between candidates for office | loc: Wahlkampf
  EN TS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, confetti.
  de TS: Dieser Wahlkampf hat alles: Plakate, Debatten, Konfetti.
  EN FS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, fireworks.
  de FS: Dieser Wahlkampf hat alles: Plakate, Debatten, Feuerwerk.
  EN TP: an election campaign
  de TP: mitten im Wahlkampf
  EN FP: a campaign against smoking
  de FP: eine Kampagne gegen das Rauchen
5165 | plastic (noun): a material that can be molded into objects | loc: Plastik
  EN TS: The river is full of plastic.
  de TS: Der Fluss ist voller Plastik.
  EN FS: The river is full of fish.
  de FS: Der Fluss ist voller Fische.
  EN TP: plastic in the river
  de TP: Plastik im Fluss
  EN FP: plastic in a recycling bin
  de FP: Plastik in einer Recyclingtonne
5166 | track (noun): the pair of rails that wheels run along | loc: Gleis
  EN TS: The tram is on the tracks.
  de TS: Die Straßenbahn ist auf den Gleisen.
  EN FS: The tram is on the grass.
  de FS: Die Straßenbahn ist auf dem Rasen.
  EN TP: tram tracks in the cobbles
  de TP: Gleise im Kopfsteinpflaster
  EN FP: tram tracks in a tunnel
  de FP: Gleise in einem Tunnel
5167 | tile (noun): a flat square piece covering a floor | loc: Fliese
  EN TS: He is touching the blue tiles.
  de TS: Er berührt die blauen Fliesen.
  EN FS: He is touching the red tiles.
  de FS: Er berührt die roten Fliesen.
  EN TP: blue-and-white wall tiles
  de TP: blau-weiße Fliesen an der Wand
  EN FP: tiles on a bathroom floor
  de FP: Fliesen auf einem Badezimmerboden
5168 | batch (noun): all the cakes baked at the same time | loc: Charge
  EN TS: The batch of tarts is okay.
  de TS: Die Charge Puddingtörtchen ist okay.
  EN FS: The batch of bread is okay.
  de FS: Die Charge Brot ist okay.
  EN TP: a batch of custard tarts
  de TP: eine Charge Puddingtörtchen
  EN FP: a batch of cookies
  de FP: eine Charge Kekse
5169 | mail (verb): to send something by the postal service | loc: per Post schicken
  EN TS: He is mailing a postcard.
  de TS: Er schickt eine Postkarte per Post ab.
  EN FS: He is mailing a package.
  de FS: Er schickt ein Paket per Post ab.
  EN TP: mailing a postcard
  de TP: eine Postkarte per Post schicken
  EN FP: mailing a parcel
  de FP: ein Paket per Post schicken
5170 | package (noun): a wrapped container you send or give | loc: Paket
  EN TS: He is handing over a package.
  de TS: Er übergibt ein Paket.
  EN FS: He is handing over a pizza.
  de FS: Er übergibt eine Pizza.
  EN TP: a wrapped birthday package
  de TP: ein verpacktes Geburtstagspaket
  EN FP: a package holiday
  de FP: ein Urlaubspaket
5171 | add (verb): to join one thing to a group of others | loc: hinzufügen
  EN TS: He is adding stock to the pot.
  de TS: Er fügt dem Topf Brühe hinzu.
  EN FS: He is adding milk to the pot.
  de FS: Er fügt dem Topf Milch hinzu.
  EN TP: adding vegetables to the pot
  de TP: dem Topf Gemüse hinzufügen
  EN FP: adding salt to the soup
  de FP: der Suppe Salz hinzufügen
5172 | bang (verb): to hit something hard and violently | loc: hauen
  EN TS: Poor dough! He is banging it.
  de TS: Armer Teig! Er haut voll drauf.
  EN FS: Poor door! He is banging it.
  de FS: Arme Tür! Er haut voll drauf.
  EN TP: banging on bread dough
  de TP: auf Brotteig hauen
  EN FP: banging on the front door
  de FP: an die Haustür hauen
5173 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: Regenmantel
  EN TS: Good thing she has a raincoat.
  de TS: Gut, dass sie einen Regenmantel hat.
  EN FS: Good thing she has a sun hat.
  de FS: Gut, dass sie einen Sonnenhut hat.
  EN TP: a red hooded raincoat
  de TP: ein roter Regenmantel mit Kapuze
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  de FP: ein Regenmantel am Haken
5174 | cheerful (adjective): bright and happy in a way that lifts you | loc: fröhlich
  EN TS: It is a cheerful dinner.
  de TS: Es ist ein fröhliches Abendessen.
  EN FS: It is a cheerful breakfast.
  de FS: Es ist ein fröhliches Frühstück.
  EN TP: a cheerful family dinner
  de TP: ein fröhliches Familienessen
  EN FP: a cheerful office party
  de FP: eine fröhliche Büroparty
5175 | moustache (noun): the hair a man grows on his upper lip | loc: Schnurrbart
  EN TS: Nice moustache, steady hands.
  de TS: Schöner Schnurrbart, ruhige Hände.
  EN FS: Nice beard, steady hands.
  de FS: Schöner Vollbart, ruhige Hände.
  EN TP: a waiter with a moustache
  de TP: ein Kellner mit Schnurrbart
  EN FP: a waiter shaving his moustache
  de FP: ein Kellner rasiert seinen Schnurrbart
5176 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: Becher
  EN TS: Hot coffee in a big mug.
  de TS: Heißer Kaffee in einem großen Becher.
  EN FS: Hot tea in a big mug.
  de FS: Heißer Tee in einem großen Becher.
  EN TP: a big white mug
  de TP: ein großer weißer Becher
  EN FP: a mug with no handle
  de FP: ein Becher ohne Henkel
5177 | teapot (noun): a container with a spout for pouring tea | loc: Teekanne
  EN TS: She is pouring from a teapot.
  de TS: Sie gießt aus einer Teekanne ein.
  EN FS: She is pouring from a bottle.
  de FS: Sie gießt aus einer Flasche ein.
  EN TP: pouring from a white teapot
  de TP: aus einer weißen Teekanne gießen
  EN FP: a teapot on the stove
  de FP: eine Teekanne auf dem Herd
5178 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: Kopftuch
  EN TS: She is baking in a headscarf.
  de TS: Sie backt mit Kopftuch.
  EN FS: She is baking in a hat.
  de FS: Sie backt mit Hut.
  EN TP: a navy headscarf
  de TP: ein dunkelblaues Kopftuch
  EN FP: a headscarf in the wind
  de FP: ein Kopftuch im Wind
5179 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: greifen
  EN TS: She is reaching into the oven.
  de TS: Sie greift in den Ofen.
  EN FS: She is reaching into a fridge.
  de FS: Sie greift in einen Kühlschrank.
  EN TP: reaching toward a hot oven
  de TP: in einen heißen Ofen greifen
  EN FP: reaching the top shelf
  de FP: nach dem obersten Regal greifen
5180 | speaker (noun): someone who speaks to a group of people | loc: Redner
  EN TS: The speaker is at the lectern.
  de TS: Der Redner steht am Rednerpult.
  EN FS: The speaker is at the piano.
  de FS: Der Redner sitzt am Klavier.
  EN TP: a speaker at a lectern
  de TP: ein Redner am Pult
  EN FP: a speaker in the audience
  de FP: ein Redner im Publikum
5181 | signature (noun): your name written in your own handwriting | loc: Unterschrift
  EN TS: Her signature is in blue ink.
  de TS: Ihre Unterschrift ist in blauer Tinte.
  EN FS: Her signature is in red ink.
  de FS: Ihre Unterschrift ist in roter Tinte.
  EN TP: a fresh blue signature
  de TP: eine frische blaue Unterschrift
  EN FP: a signature on a cheque
  de FP: eine Unterschrift auf einem Scheck
5182 | achievement (noun): the action of finishing something difficult | loc: Leistung
  EN TS: Look, the mural is her achievement.
  de TS: Schau, das Wandbild ist ihre Leistung.
  EN FS: Look, the mural is his achievement.
  de FS: Schau, das Wandbild ist seine Leistung.
  EN TP: a big mural achievement
  de TP: ein Wandbild als große Leistung
  EN FP: a video game achievement
  de FP: eine Leistung im Videospiel
5183 | passionate (adjective): showing very strong emotions | loc: leidenschaftlich
  EN TS: So passionate, the chalk is flying!
  de TS: So leidenschaftlich, dass die Kreide fliegt!
  EN FS: So passionate, the books are flying!
  de FS: So leidenschaftlich, dass die Bücher fliegen!
  EN TP: a passionate old teacher
  de TP: ein leidenschaftlicher alter Lehrer
  EN FP: a passionate young singer
  de FP: ein leidenschaftlicher junger Sänger
5184 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: romantisch
  EN TS: He proposed. So romantic!
  de TS: Er hat ihr einen Antrag gemacht. So romantisch!
  EN FS: He sang. So romantic!
  de FS: Er hat ihr was vorgesungen. So romantisch!
  EN TP: a romantic proposal
  de TP: ein romantischer Heiratsantrag
  EN FP: a romantic comedy film
  de FP: eine romantische Komödie
5185 | kindness (noun): being considerate and sympathetic to others | loc: Freundlichkeit
  EN TS: Kindness keeps the man dry.
  de TS: Freundlichkeit hält den Mann trocken.
  EN FS: Kindness keeps the dog dry.
  de FS: Freundlichkeit hält den Hund trocken.
  EN TP: kindness in the rain
  de TP: Freundlichkeit im Regen
  EN FP: kindness in the sun
  de FP: Freundlichkeit in der Sonne
5186 | public (noun): people in general, taken as a whole | loc: Öffentlichkeit
  EN TS: The public is in the square.
  de TS: Die Öffentlichkeit ist auf dem Platz.
  EN FS: The public is in the church.
  de FS: Die Öffentlichkeit ist in der Kirche.
  EN TP: the public in the square
  de TP: die Öffentlichkeit auf dem Platz
  EN FP: the public in the theatre
  de FP: die Öffentlichkeit im Theater
5187 | wagon (noun): a wheeled vehicle pulled by a tractor or animal | loc: Wagen
  EN TS: Strong boy! He's pulling a wagon!
  de TS: Starker Junge! Er zieht einen Wagen!
  EN FS: Strong boy! He's pulling a car!
  de FS: Starker Junge! Er zieht ein Auto!
  EN TP: pulling a farm wagon
  de TP: einen Bauernwagen ziehen
  EN FP: pulling a horse wagon
  de FP: einen Pferdewagen ziehen
5188 | disappointment (noun): the feeling when your expectations are not met | loc: Enttäuschung
  EN TS: A boot? Total disappointment.
  de TS: Ein Stiefel? Totale Enttäuschung.
  EN FS: A fish? Total disappointment.
  de FS: Ein Fisch? Totale Enttäuschung.
  EN TP: disappointment on a jetty
  de TP: Enttäuschung auf einem Steg
  EN FP: disappointment at a zoo
  de FP: Enttäuschung im Zoo
5189 | weather (noun): the state of the sky: sun, rain, wind, clouds | loc: Wetter
  EN TS: Weather check: still raining.
  de TS: Wettercheck: regnet immer noch.
  EN FS: Weather check: still snowing.
  de FS: Wettercheck: schneit immer noch.
  EN TP: checking the weather by hand
  de TP: das Wetter mit der Hand prüfen
  EN FP: the weather on TV
  de FP: das Wetter im Fernsehen
5190 | windy (adjective): with a lot of wind blowing | loc: windig
  EN TS: Windy? She loves it!
  de TS: Windig? Sie liebt es!
  EN FS: Sunny? She loves it!
  de FS: Sonnig? Sie liebt es!
  EN TP: a windy seafront
  de TP: eine windige Strandpromenade
  EN FP: a windy mountain top
  de FP: ein windiger Berggipfel
5191 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: verschneit
  EN TS: A flag on a snowy plain.
  de TS: Eine Fahne auf einer verschneiten Ebene.
  EN FS: A flag on a sandy beach.
  de FS: Eine Fahne an einem Sandstrand.
  EN TP: a snowy white plain
  de TP: eine verschneite weiße Ebene
  EN FP: a snowy city street
  de FP: eine verschneite Straße in der Stadt
5192 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: Horizont
  EN TS: Only snow up to the horizon.
  de TS: Nur Schnee bis zum Horizont.
  EN FS: Only sand up to the horizon.
  de FS: Nur Sand bis zum Horizont.
  EN TP: snow up to the horizon
  de TP: Schnee bis zum Horizont
  EN FP: the sea on the horizon
  de FP: das Meer am Horizont
5193 | rash (noun): red itchy spots on the skin | loc: Ausschlag
  EN TS: Cream on the rash? It stings!
  de TS: Creme auf den Ausschlag? Das brennt!
  EN FS: Cream on the burn? It stings!
  de FS: Creme auf die Verbrennung? Das brennt!
  EN TP: cream on a red rash
  de TP: Creme auf einem roten Ausschlag
  EN FP: a rash on her cheek
  de FP: ein Ausschlag auf ihrer Wange
5194 | novel (noun): a long fictional story printed as a book | loc: Roman
  EN TS: Guess who loves this novel?
  de TS: Rate mal, wer diesen Roman liebt?
  EN FS: Guess who loves this film?
  de FS: Rate mal, wer diesen Film liebt?
  EN TP: reading a thick novel
  de TP: einen dicken Roman lesen
  EN FP: writing a novel
  de FP: einen Roman schreiben
5195 | bench (noun): a long seat for more than one person | loc: Bank
  EN TS: His books take up the whole bench.
  de TS: Seine Bücher belegen die ganze Bank.
  EN FS: His shoes take up the whole bench.
  de FS: Seine Schuhe belegen die ganze Bank.
  EN TP: books on a park bench
  de TP: Bücher auf einer Parkbank
  EN FP: a dog on a bench
  de FP: ein Hund auf einer Bank
5197 | rebel (verb): to take part in a rebellion | loc: rebellieren
  EN TS: The office is rebelling!
  de TS: Das Büro rebelliert!
  EN FS: The office is sleeping!
  de FS: Das Büro schläft!
  EN TP: rebelling against work
  de TP: gegen die Arbeit rebellieren
  EN FP: rebelling against parents
  de FP: gegen die Eltern rebellieren
5198 | sheet (noun): paper you write or print on | loc: Blatt
  EN TS: She is handing him a sheet.
  de TS: Sie reicht ihm ein Blatt.
  EN FS: She is handing him a cup.
  de FS: Sie reicht ihm einen Becher.
  EN TP: a small written sheet
  de TP: ein kleines beschriebenes Blatt
  EN FP: a sheet on a bed
  de FP: ein Laken auf dem Bett
5199 | follow (verb): to act in the way rules tell you | loc: befolgen
  EN TS: Recipe followed step by step.
  de TS: Rezept Schritt für Schritt befolgt.
  EN FS: Map followed step by step.
  de FS: Karte Schritt für Schritt befolgt.
  EN TP: following a handwritten recipe
  de TP: ein handgeschriebenes Rezept befolgen
  EN FP: following a friend online
  de FP: einem Freund online folgen
5200 | lively (adjective): full of life and energy | loc: lebhaft
  EN TS: What a lively group!
  de TS: Was für eine lebhafte Truppe!
  EN FS: What a lively dog!
  de FS: Was für ein lebhafter Hund!
  EN TP: a lively living room
  de TP: ein lebhaftes Wohnzimmer
  EN FP: a lively dance club
  de FP: ein lebhafter Tanzclub
5201 | reflect (verb): to send an image or light back | loc: spiegeln
  EN TS: The water reflects everything, including the volcano.
  de TS: Das Wasser spiegelt alles, sogar den Vulkan.
  EN FS: The water reflects everything, including the moon.
  de FS: Das Wasser spiegelt alles, sogar den Mond.
  EN TP: a volcano reflected in water
  de TP: ein Vulkan spiegelt sich im Wasser
  EN FP: a face in a mirror
  de FP: ein Gesicht im Spiegel
5202 | put (verb): to set something down in a certain place | loc: legen
  EN TS: She put the whole shop in the fridge!
  de TS: Sie hat den ganzen Laden in den Kühlschrank gelegt!
  EN FS: She put the whole shop in the oven!
  de FS: Sie hat den ganzen Laden in den Ofen gelegt!
  EN TP: putting food in the fridge
  de TP: Essen in den Kühlschrank legen
  EN FP: putting food on the table
  de FP: Essen auf den Tisch legen
5203 | relative (noun): a person related by blood or marriage | loc: Verwandter
  EN TS: The relatives have arrived!
  de TS: Die Verwandten sind da!
  EN FS: The relatives have left!
  de FS: Die Verwandten sind weg!
  EN TP: relatives at the front door
  de TP: Verwandte an der Haustür
  EN FP: relatives at an airport
  de FP: Verwandte am Flughafen
5204 | improve (verb): to make better | loc: verbessern
  EN TS: The room has improved a lot.
  de TS: Das Zimmer hat sich stark verbessert.
  EN FS: The garden has improved a lot.
  de FS: Der Garten hat sich stark verbessert.
  EN TP: improving an old room
  de TP: ein altes Zimmer verbessern
  EN FP: improving their English
  de FP: ihr Englisch verbessern
5205 | oath (noun): a serious promise to tell the truth | loc: Eid
  EN TS: She is taking the oath.
  de TS: Sie legt den Eid ab.
  EN FS: He is taking the oath.
  de FS: Er legt den Eid ab.
  EN TP: taking an oath
  de TP: einen Eid ablegen
  EN FP: breaking an oath
  de FP: einen Eid brechen
5206 | evidence (noun): your reason for belief or disbelief | loc: Beweis
  EN TS: She found the evidence!
  de TS: Sie hat den Beweis gefunden!
  EN FS: She lost the evidence!
  de FS: Sie hat den Beweis verloren!
  EN TP: pinning up evidence
  de TP: Beweise anpinnen
  EN FP: hiding the evidence
  de FP: die Beweise verstecken
5207 | sweat (noun): the salty fluid your skin lets out when hot | loc: Schweiß
  EN TS: Big mountains, lots of sweat.
  de TS: Große Berge, viel Schweiß.
  EN FS: Big lakes, lots of sweat.
  de FS: Große Seen, viel Schweiß.
  EN TP: dripping with sweat
  de TP: triefend vor Schweiß
  EN FP: sweat after a sauna
  de FP: Schweiß nach der Sauna
5208 | cuisine (noun): a style of preparing food, or that food | loc: Küche
  EN TS: Every cuisine amazes him!
  de TS: Jede Küche begeistert ihn!
  EN FS: Every drink amazes him!
  de FS: Jedes Getränk begeistert ihn!
  EN TP: three different cuisines
  de TP: drei verschiedene Küchen
  EN FP: just one cuisine
  de FP: nur eine Küche
5209 | lounge (verb): to sit or lie back comfortably doing nothing | loc: faulenzen
  EN TS: Nobody works; they are all lounging.
  de TS: Keiner arbeitet, alle faulenzen.
  EN FS: Nobody works; they are all dancing.
  de FS: Keiner arbeitet, alle tanzen.
  EN TP: lounging in a hammock
  de TP: in einer Hängematte faulenzen
  EN FP: lounging on a boat
  de FP: auf einem Boot faulenzen
